Short-term effects of intravitreal ranibizumab and bevacizumab administration on 24-h ambulatory blood pressure monitoring recordings in normotensive patients with age-related macular degeneration.PurposeTo evaluate effects of intravitreal ranibizumab and bevacizumab administration on ambulatory blood pressure monitoring (ABPM) recordings in normotensive patients with age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Patients and methodsA total of 72 patients (mean age: 61.8(6.2) years, 52.8% were females) diagnosed with AMD were included in this study as divided into ranibizumab (n=34) and bevacizumab (n=38) treatment groups. Twenty-four hour, nighttime, and daytime ABMP values for systolic and diastolic BP were recorded in study groups before and after the third intravitreal injection of ranibizumab or bevacizumab.ResultsRanibizumab injection had no impact on ABPM recordings and dipping status. In the bevacizumab group, increased daytime (129.0(6.6) vs 127.7(6.6) mm Hg, P=0.002) and nighttime systolic (116.9(7.5) vs 112.6(7.1) mmHg, p<0.001) BP and decreased daytime diastolic (80.1(6.5) vs 82.4(6.1)mm Hg, P=0.001) BP were noted in the post-injection period. Also, percentage of non-dippers was significantly increased from 5.3% at pre-injection to 28.9% (P=0.004) at the post-injection period.ConclusionIn conclusion, given that it has no significant impact on ABPM recordings and dipping status, in our study, intravitreal ranibizumab injection may be the better choice in the management of AMD.Randomized, double-masked, sham-controlled trial of ranibizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration: PIER Study year 1.To evaluate the efficacy and safety of ranibizumab administered monthly for three months and then quarterly in patients with subfoveal choroidal neovascularization (CNV) secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Phase IIIb, multicenter, randomized, double-masked, sham injection-controlled trial in patients with predominantly or minimally classic or occult with no classic CNV lesions.Patients were randomized 1:1:1 to 0.3 mg ranibizumab (n = 60), 0.5 mg ranibizumab (n = 61), or sham (n = 63) treatment groups. The primary efficacy endpoint was mean change from baseline visual acuity (VA) at month 12.Mean changes from baseline VA at 12 months were -16.3, -1.6, and -0.2 letters for the sham, 0.3 mg, and 0.5 mg groups, respectively (P < or = .0001, each ranibizumab dose vs sham). Ranibizumab arrested CNV growth and reduced leakage from CNV. However, the treatment effect declined in the ranibizumab groups during quarterly dosing (e.g., at three months the mean changes from baseline VA had been gains of 2.9 and 4.3 letters for the 0.3 mg and 0.5 mg doses, respectively). Results of subgroups analyses of mean change from baseline VA at 12 months by baseline age, VA, and lesion characteristics were consistent with the overall results. Few serious ocular or nonocular adverse events occurred in any group.Ranibizumab administered monthly for three months and then quarterly provided significant VA benefit to patients with AMD-related subfoveal CNV and was well tolerated. The incidence of serious ocular or nonocular adverse events was low.Bevacizumab for neovascular age related macular degeneration (ABC Trial): multicentre randomised double masked study.To evaluate the efficacy and safety of intravitreous bevacizumab injections for the treatment of neovascular age related macular degeneration.Prospective, double masked, multicentre, randomised controlled trial.Three ophthalmology centres in the United Kingdom.131 patients (mean age 81) with wet age related macular degeneration randomised 1:1 to intervention or control.Intravitreous bevacizumab (1.25 mg, three loading injections at six week intervals followed by further treatment if required at six week intervals) or standard treatment available at the start of the trial (photodynamic treatment with verteporfin for predominantly classic type neovascular age related macular degeneration, or intravitreal pegaptanib or sham treatment for occult or minimally classic type neovascular age related macular degeneration).Bevacizumab vs ranibizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration in Chinese patients.To compare the clinical efficacy of intravitreal injections of bevacizumab and ranibizumab for treating Chinese patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Among 60 Chinese patients with exudative AMD (60 eyes), 28 received intravitreal bevacizumab injections (1.25mg) and 32 received intravitreal ranibizumab injections (0.5mg), once a month for 3 months and were followed for a total of 6 months. Monthly optical coherence tomography (OCT) was used to determine whether the patients received additional treatments during the follow-up. We compared the baseline and 6-month follow-up values of mean best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA) and central retinal thickness (CRT) in both groups of patients. We also compared the occurrence of adverse events.At the 6-month follow-up, the mean BCVA (logMAR) of the bevacizumab and ranibizumab treatment groups improved from the baseline measurements of 0.72±0.23 and 0.73±0.22 to 0.47±0.14 and 0.45±0.20, respectively (P<0.05 for both groups). However, the change was not significantly different between the two groups. As evaluated by OCT, CRT decreased from 366.71±34.72µm and 352±36.9µm at baseline to 250.86±41.51µm and 243.22±41.38µm in the bevacizumab and ranibizumab groups, respectively (P<0.05 for both groups). However, the change was not significantly different between the two groups. There were no severe local adverse reactions or systemic adverse events.Intravitreal bevacizumab and ranibizumab have equivalent effects on BCVA and CRT and appeare safe over the short-term.SAVE-AMD: Safety of VEGF Inhibitors in Age-Related Macular Degeneration.To determine whether intraocular treatment with vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) inhibitors change systemic endothelial function (EF) in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).In this prospective, randomized, 2-center, double-masked controlled interventional trial, patients with neovascular and dry AMD were enrolled. Eligible neovascular AMD patients received 2 intravitreal loading doses of either ranibizumab 0.5 mg or bevacizumab 1.25 mg at 4-week intervals and were subsequently followed every 4 weeks and treated according to a pro re nata regime for up to 1 year. Patients with dry AMD served as controls. The primary endpoint was the change in EF assessed by flow-mediated dilatation (FMD) after 2 months of treatment with VEGF inhibitors in patients with AMD compared to patients with dry AMD. FMD was assessed with B-mode high-resolution ultrasonography of the left brachial artery.24 patients with neovascular AMD and 26 patients with dry ADM were included in the trial. Treatment with VEGF inhibitors did not significantly change FMD (from 4.7 ± 2.4 to 3.9 ± 1.9% after 8 weeks, p = 0.07, and to 5.1 ± 2.0% after 1 year; p = 0.93 vs. baseline, respectively).EF did not significantly differ between patients with neovascular AMD treated with intravitreal VEGF inhibition and patients with dry AMD.Cerebrovascular accidents in patients treated for choroidal neovascularization with ranibizumab in randomized controlled trials.To analyze cerebrovascular accidents (CVAs) pooled from large, randomized, controlled clinical trials of ranibizumab treatment for neovascular age-related macular degeneration.Events in five trials (FOCUS, MARINA, ANCHOR, PIER, and SAILOR) were analyzed using a standard safety monitoring process. Exact methods, stratified by study, were used to test for treatment differences based on odds ratios. A stepwise logistic regression model was fit to classify subjects' risk for CVA based on medical history. Treatment differences in CVA rates at 1 year or 2 years were evaluated within risk groups using stratified exact methods.Pooled 2-year CVA rates were <3%; odds ratios (95% confidence intervals) for CVA risk were 1.2 (0.4-4.4) for ranibizumab 0.3-mg versus control, 2.2 (0.8-7.1) for 0.5 mg versus control, and 1.5 (0.8-3.0) for 0.5-mg versus 0.3-mg ranibizumab. No substantial increased risk of CVA for 0.5 mg versus 0.3 mg was identified in pooled analyses or any of the individual trials. In pooled analyses, the difference between 0.5-mg ranibizumab and control was larger (7.7 [1.2-177]) among high-risk CVA patients.This analysis provided some evidence, although not definitive, of a potential increased risk of CVA with ranibizumab versus control or with 0.5-mg versus 0.3-mg ranibizumab. Continued monitoring for CVA within clinical trials seems warrented.A randomised prospective double-masked exploratory study comparing combination photodynamic treatment and intravitreal ranibizumab vs intravitreal ranibizumab monotherapy in the treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration.The aim of this study is to evaluate the effect of standard-fluence verteporfin photodynamic therapy (PDT) delivered on the first day of a ranibizumab regimen for choroidal neovascularisation secondary to age-related macular degeneration compared with ranibizumab monotherapy.Patients were randomised to sham or standard-fluence verteporfin PDT at baseline. The first of three monthly loading doses of ranibizumab was given on the same day, and thereafter patients received monthly treatment with ranibizumab as required. All patients underwent monthly visual acuity and OCT assessment and 3-monthly fluorescein angiography with follow-up to 1 year.In all, 18 patients were recruited. The PDT group gained a mean of 2.2 ETDRS letters at 1 year and the sham group gained a mean of 4.4 letters (P=0.47). Both groups required a mean of 1.3 injections of ranibizumab following the 3-month loading phase. Fluorescein angiography at 1 month demonstrated marked choroidal hypoperfusion in all patients treated with PDT with reduced choroidal perfusion persisting to month 12. This did not occur in the sham group.The addition of standard-fluence verteporfin PDT at baseline to a ranibizumab regimen conferred no benefit in terms of visual acuity or number of ranibizumab injections required at 1 year. The combination of these treatments resulted in persistent reduced choroidal perfusion, which raises potential safety concerns.Subretinal Hyperreflective Material in the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials.To evaluate the association of subretinal hyperreflective material (SHRM) with visual acuity (VA), geographic atrophy (GA), and scar in the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials (CATT).Prospective cohort study within a randomized clinical trial.The 1185 CATT participants.Masked readers graded scar and GA on fundus photography and fluorescein angiography and graded SHRM on time-domain and spectral-domain (SD) optical coherence tomography (OCT) throughout 104 weeks. Measurements of SHRM height and width in the fovea, within the center 1 mm(2), or outside the center 1mm(2) were obtained on SD OCT images at 56 (n = 76) and 104 (n = 66) weeks.Presence of SHRM, as well as location and size, and associations with VA, scar, and GA.Among CATT participants, the percentage with SHRM at enrollment was 77%, decreasing to 68% at 4 weeks after treatment and to 54% at 104 weeks. At 104 weeks, scar was present more often in eyes with persistent SHRM than in eyes with SHRM that resolved (64% vs. 31%; P < 0.0001). Among eyes with detailed evaluation of SHRM at weeks 56 (n = 76) and 104 (n = 66), mean VA letter score was 73.5 (standard error [SE], 2.8), 73.1 (SE, 3.4), 65.3 (SE, 3.5), and 63.9 (SE, 3.7) when SHRM was absent, present outside the central 1 mm(2), present within the central 1 mm(2) but not the foveal center, or present at the foveal center (P = 0.02), respectively. When SHRM was present, the median maximum height under the fovea, within the central 1 mm(2) including the fovea and anywhere within the scan, was 86 μm, 120 μm, and 122 μm, respectively. Visual acuity was decreased with greater SHRM height and width (P < 0.05).In eyes with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD), SHRM is common and often persists after anti-vascular endothelial growth factor treatment. At 2 years, eyes with scar were more likely to have SHRM than other eyes. Greater SHRM dimensions were associated with worse VA. In eyes with neovascular AMD, SHRM is an important morphologic biomarker.Randomised clinical trial of intravitreal Avastin vs photodynamic therapy and intravitreal triamcinolone: long-term results.To compare 1-year functional and anatomic outcomes of intravitreal bevacizumab (IVB) and photodynamic therapy plus intravitreal triamcinolone (PDT+IVTA) combination in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).In this prospective, randomised, controlled clinical trial, 28 patients were included. All patients were randomised 1 : 1 to 0.04 ml/1 mg of IVB or PDT plus same day 0.1 ml/4 mg IVTA (PDT+IVTA). Follow-up examinations were performed in monthly intervals in IVB group and every 3 months in PDT+IVTA group. Main outcomes were change in mean visual acuity (VA), mean central retinal thickness (CRT) and the mean number of treatments.At month 12, mean VA improved to a 1.5-line gain in IVB group, and lost three letters in PDT+IVTA group (P=0.02). Mean CRT was reduced from 357 microm at baseline to 244 microm at month 12 in IVB group and from 326 microm to 254 microm, respectively, in PDT+IVTA group (P=0.8). The mean number of treatments was 6.8 in the IVB group vs 1.9 in the PDT+IVTA group. No significant local or systemic safety concerns were detected during follow-up time.Patients treated with IVB showed a significant better VA outcome compared with the PDT+IVTA group despite the fact that both modalities showed equal potency in reducing CRT during a 12-month period.Brolucizumab Versus Aflibercept in Participants with Neovascular Age-Related Macular Degeneration: A Randomized Trial.To compare the efficacy and safety of brolucizumab with aflibercept to treat neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Prospective, randomized, double-masked, multicenter, 2-arm, phase 2 study.Eighty-nine treatment-naïve participants, aged ≥50 years, with active choroidal neovascularization secondary to AMD.Eligible participants were randomized 1:1 to intravitreal brolucizumab (6 mg/50 μl) or aflibercept (2 mg/50 μl). Both groups received 3 monthly loading doses and were then treated every 8 weeks (q8) with assessment up to week 40. In the brolucizumab group, the final q8 cycle was extended to enable 2 cycles of treatment every 12 weeks (q12; to week 56); participants on aflibercept continued on q8. Unscheduled treatments were allowed at the investigator's discretion.The primary and secondary hypotheses were noninferiority (margin: 5 letters at a 1-sided alpha level 0.1) in best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA) change from baseline of brolucizumab versus aflibercept at weeks 12 and 16, respectively. BCVA, central subfield thickness (CSFT), and morphologic features were assessed throughout the study.The mean BCVA change from baseline (letters) with brolucizumab was noninferior to aflibercept at week 12 (5.75 and 6.89, respectively [80% confidence interval for treatment difference, -4.19 to 1.93]) and week 16 (6.04 and 6.62 [-3.72 to 2.56]), with no notable differences up to week 40. Outcomes exploring disease activity during the q8 treatment cycles suggest greater stability of the brolucizumab participants, supported by receipt of fewer unscheduled treatments versus aflibercept (6 vs. 15) and more stable CSFT reductions. In addition, from post hoc analysis, a greater proportion of brolucizumab-treated eyes had resolved intraretinal and subretinal fluid compared with aflibercept-treated eyes. Approximately 50% of brolucizumab-treated eyes had stable BCVA during the q12 cycles. Brolucizumab and aflibercept adverse events were comparable.During the matched q8 phase, the BCVA in brolucizumab-treated eyes appeared comparable to aflibercept-treated eyes, with more stable CSFT reductions, receipt of fewer unscheduled treatments, and higher rates of fluid resolution. The brolucizumab safety profile was similar to aflibercept over 56 weeks of treatment. A 12-week treatment cycle for brolucizumab may be viable in a relevant proportion of eyes.Ranibizumab and bevacizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration.Clinical trials have established the efficacy of ranibizumab for the treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD). In addition, bevacizumab is used off-label to treat AMD, despite the absence of similar supporting data.In a multicenter, single-blind, noninferiority trial, we randomly assigned 1208 patients with neovascular AMD to receive intravitreal injections of ranibizumab or bevacizumab on either a monthly schedule or as needed with monthly evaluation. The primary outcome was the mean change in visual acuity at 1 year, with a noninferiority limit of 5 letters on the eye chart.Bevacizumab administered monthly was equivalent to ranibizumab administered monthly, with 8.0 and 8.5 letters gained, respectively. Bevacizumab administered as needed was equivalent to ranibizumab as needed, with 5.9 and 6.8 letters gained, respectively. Ranibizumab as needed was equivalent to monthly ranibizumab, although the comparison between bevacizumab as needed and monthly bevacizumab was inconclusive. The mean decrease in central retinal thickness was greater in the ranibizumab-monthly group (196 μm) than in the other groups (152 to 168 μm, P=0.03 by analysis of variance). Rates of death, myocardial infarction, and stroke were similar for patients receiving either bevacizumab or ranibizumab (P>0.20). The proportion of patients with serious systemic adverse events (primarily hospitalizations) was higher with bevacizumab than with ranibizumab (24.1% vs. 19.0%; risk ratio, 1.29; 95% confidence interval, 1.01 to 1.66), with excess events broadly distributed in disease categories not identified in previous studies as areas of concern.At 1 year, bevacizumab and ranibizumab had equivalent effects on visual acuity when administered according to the same schedule. Ranibizumab given as needed with monthly evaluation had effects on vision that were equivalent to those of ranibizumab administered monthly. Differences in rates of serious adverse events require further study. (Funded by the National Eye Institute; ClinicalTrials.gov number, NCT00593450.).Cost-effectiveness of ranibizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration.Intravitreal ranibizumab prevents vision loss and improves visual acuity in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration, but it is expensive, and efficacy beyond 2 years is uncertain.We assessed the cost-effectiveness of ranibizumab compared with no ranibizumab over 10 years, using randomized trial efficacy data for the first 2 years, post-trial efficacy assumptions, and ranibizumab acquisition costs ranging from the wholesale price ($1,950 per dose) to the price of bevazicumab ($50), a similar molecule which may be equally efficacious. We used a computer simulation model to estimate the probability of blindness, the number of quality-adjusted life-years (QALYs), direct costs (in 2004 U.S. dollars), and cost-effectiveness ratios for a 67-year old woman. Costs and QALYs were discounted at 3% per year.The probability of blindness over 10 years was reduced from 56% to 34% if ranibizumab was efficacious for only 2 years, 27% if efficacy was maintained for a further 2 years only (base-case scenario), and 17% if visual acuity at 4 years was then sustained. It was cost-saving under all price assumptions, when caregiver costs were included. When caregiver costs were excluded, the cost per QALY for the base-case ranged from $5,600, assuming the bevazicumab price, to $91,900 assuming the wholesale ranibizumab price. The cost per QALY was < $50,000 when the cost of ranibizumab was less than $1000.From a societal perspective, ranibizumab was cost-saving. From a health care funder's perspective, ranibizumab was an efficient treatment when it cost less than $1000 per dose.Cost-effectiveness of pegaptanib compared to photodynamic therapy with verteporfin and to standard care in the treatment of subfoveal wet age-related macular degeneration in Canada.Age-related macular degeneration (AMD) is characterized by loss of central vision and is the leading cause of blindness among persons over the age of 50 years in Canada. The wet form of AMD has 3 subtypes-occult, minimally classic, and predominantly classic. Photodynamic therapy (PDT) with verteporfin is indicated only for the category of predominantly classic wet AMD. Currently, there are no treatments available for the other AMD subtypes. Pegaptanib sodium was the first pharmacologic therapy approved in Canada for the treatment of subfoveal wet AMD regardless of subtype.The aim of this study was to examine the cost-effectiveness of pegaptanib versus PDT with verteporfin and versus standard care for the treatment of subfoveal wet AMD in patients aged 65 years in Canada.A Markov model based on visual acuity in the better-seeing eye was developed. Clinical efficacy was taken from the clinical trials. Costs of treatment, comorbidities (eg, depression, fractures, need for assisted living), vision rehabilitation, visual aids, and adverse events were considered. Costs, utilities, and mortality were estimated from data from the available published literature. Costs were reported in 2004 Canadian dollars, and costs and outcomes were discounted at 3% per annum. Lifetime costs, quality-adjusted life-years (QALYs), and vision years gained (VYGs) were estimated. Sensitivity analyses were performed to determine model robustness.Patients who received pegaptanib experienced more QALYs gained (4.17) and VYGs (3.83) compared with patients who received PDT (3.87 and 3.01, respectively) or standard care (3.96 and 3.26). Mean total costs per patient were greater in patients who received pegaptanib compared to those who received PDT or standard care ($20,016 vs $15,345 or $7669, respectively). The incremental cost per QALY in patients receiving pegaptanib compared to those receiving PDT was $49,052 and $59,039 for patients receiving pegaptanib versus standard care. The incremental cost per VYG was $20,401 and $21,559 with pegaptanib versus PDT and standard care, respectively. Sensitivity analyses found that the model was relatively robust to changes in various model parameters.The results of this analysis suggest that in Canada, pegaptanib is a cost-effective treatment for subfoveal wet AMD in elderly patients, regardless of lesion subtype, compared to PDT with verteporfin and to standard care.Intravitreal injection of 2.5 mg versus 1.25 mg bevacizumab (Avastin) for treatment of CNV associated with AMD.To compare the safety and efficacy of intravitreal injections of 1.25 and 2.5 mg bevacizumab for treatment of choroidal neovascularization associated with age-related macular degeneration.In this prospective, randomized, comparative clinical trial, 86 patients with active choroidal neovascularization associated with age-related macular degeneration were studied. Baseline best-corrected visual acuity in the study eye was from 20/40 to 20/2000. Patients were randomly assigned to receive intravitreal injections of 2.5 (39 patients) or 1.25 mg (47 patients) of intravitreal bevacizumab. Best-corrected visual acuity measurement and clinical ocular examination were performed at 1 week, 1 month and then monthly for 5 months. Fluorescein angiography and optical coherence tomography were performed at 1 month and 3 months after each injection.The mean change in best-corrected visual acuity was -0.06 +/- 0.3 logMAR in 1.25 mg and -0.07 +/- 0.34 in 2.5 mg groups in 3 months (P = 0.9) and -0.06 +/- 0.27 logMAR in 1.25 mg and -0.09 +/- 0.28 in 2.5 mg groups in 5 months (P = 0.6). There was no significant difference in visual acuity between the two groups at any time point during the study. The mean change in foveal thickness was -49 +/- 36 micro in 1.25 mg and -65 +/- 31 micro in 2.5 mg group (P = 0.6). In 2.5 mg group, three cases of vitreous reaction and one case of massive subretinal hemorrhage were observed.Intravitreal injection of 2.5 mg bevacizumab has the same efficacy as 1.25 mg, but may be associated with a higher rate of adverse events.Association of Baseline Characteristics and Early Vision Response with 2-Year Vision Outcomes in the Comparison of AMD Treatments Trials (CATT).To evaluate the association of baseline characteristics and early visual acuity (VA) response with visual outcomes at years 1 or 2 in the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration (AMD) Treatments Trials (CATT).Secondary analysis of CATT.The 1185 CATT participants with baseline VA of 20/25 to 20/320.Participants were assigned to ranibizumab or bevacizumab and to 1 of 3 dosing regimens. Associations of baseline characteristics and early VA response (week 4 or 12) with VA response at years 1 or 2 were assessed by R(2) from linear regression analyses. Patients who had a poor initial response (VA 20/40 or worse with persistent fluid and without ≥1-line VA gain) were defined as candidates for changing treatment.Visual acuity change from baseline.Statistically significant (P < 0.05) baseline predictors for less VA gain at year 2 were older age, VA of 20/40 or better, larger choroidal neovascularization area, presence of geographic atrophy, total foveal thickness ≤325 μm or ≥425 μm, and elevation of retinal pigment epithelium. Among 176 eyes gaining ≥3 lines at week 12, 78% had a ≥3-line gain at year 2, whereas among 113 eyes losing ≥1 line at week 12, 27% improved to a ≥1-line gain at year 2. Visual acuity response at week 12 was more predictive of VA response at year 2 (R(2) = 0.30) than VA response at week 4 (R(2) = 0.17) and baseline predictors (R(2) = 0.13; P < 0.0001). Among 126 candidates for changing treatment drug at week 12, mean VA improved by 2.8 letters (P = 0.050), mean total retinal thickness decreased 53 μm (P < 0.0001), and fluid resolved in 33% (P < 0.0001) between week 12 and year 1 with continued use of the same drug and regimen. Similar improvements were observed among 83 candidates for changing drugs at week 24.Visual acuity response at week 12 is more predictive of 2-year vision outcomes than either several baseline characteristics or week 4 response. Eyes with poor initial response may benefit from continued treatment without switching to another drug.Bevacizumab vs ranibizumab for age-related macular degeneration: early results of a prospective double-masked, randomized clinical trial.To report early outcomes of a prospective, double-masked, controlled trial comparing bevacizumab (Avastin; Genentech Inc, South San Francisco, California, USA) to ranibizumab (Lucentis; Genentech Inc) for the treatment of age-related macular degeneration.Prospective, double-masked, randomized clinical trial.This is a single-center, randomized clinical trial at the Boston Veterans Affairs Healthcare System. Patients who met inclusion criteria were randomized 2:1 to bevacizumab or ranibizumab. Each patient contributed 1 eye to the study. All subjects and investigators (except for the pharmacist responsible for study assignments) were masked to treatment arms. Visual acuity (VA) was checked on Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study (ETDRS) chart. Patients were given either bevacizumab or ranibizumab every month for the first 3 months, followed by optical coherence tomography-guided, variable-dosing schedule. Main outcomes measured were VA and foveal thickness.Twenty patients completed the 6-month follow up. Thirteen patients received bevacizumab and 7 patients received ranibizumab. No subjects in either group lost more than 15 letters on ETDRS chart. The average preoperative VA was 31.6 letters in the bevacizumab group and 30.4 letters in the ranibizumab group. At 6 months follow-up, mean vision was 46.4 letters in the bevacizumab group and 37.4 letters in the ranibizumab group. Two-tailed ttest failed to show statistical significance between the two groups. Patients in the bevacizumab group underwent an average of 5 injections, while patients in the ranibizumab group underwent a mean of 4 injections.Early results of a head-to-head, randomized, double-masked, prospective, single-center controlled trial between bevacizumab and ranibizumab show no difference in efficacy between the two treatments for choroidal neovascularizaton in the treatment of age-related macular degeneration. As this study conveys results of a small number of patients, further studies with larger sample sizes are needed in order to establish statistical significance.A Phase IIIb study to evaluate the safety of ranibizumab in subjects with neovascular age-related macular degeneration.To evaluate the safety and efficacy of intravitreal ranibizumab in a large population of subjects with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Twelve-month randomized (cohort 1) or open-label (cohort 2) multicenter clinical trial.A total of 4300 subjects with angiographically determined subfoveal choroidal neovascularization (CNV) secondary to AMD.Cohort 1 subjects were randomized 1:1 to receive 0.3 mg (n = 1169) or 0.5 mg (n = 1209) intravitreal ranibizumab for 3 monthly loading doses. Dose groups were stratified by AMD treatment history (treatment-naïve vs. previously treated). Cohort 1 subjects were retreated on the basis of optical coherence tomography (OCT) or visual acuity (VA) criteria. Cohort 2 subjects (n = 1922) received an initial intravitreal dose of 0.5 mg ranibizumab and were retreated at physician discretion. Safety was evaluated at all visits.Safety outcomes included the incidence of ocular and nonocular adverse events (AEs) and serious adverse events (SAEs). Efficacy outcomes included changes in best-corrected VA over time.Some 81.7% of cohort 1 subjects and 49.9% of cohort 2 subjects completed the 12-month study. The average total number of ranibizumab injections was 4.9 for cohort 1 and 3.6 for cohort 2. The incidence of vascular and nonvascular deaths during the 12-month study was 0.9% and 0.7% in the cohort 1 0.3 mg group, 0.8% and 1.5% in the cohort 1 0.5 mg group, and 0.7% and 0.9% in cohort 2, respectively. The incidence of death due to unknown cause was 0.1% in both cohort 1 dose groups and cohort 2. The number of vascular deaths and deaths due to unknown cause did not differ across cohorts or dose groups. Stroke rates were 0.7%, 1.2%, and 0.6% in the 0.3 mg and 0.5 mg groups and cohort 2, respectively. At month 12, cohort 1 treatment-naïve subjects had gained an average of 0.5 (0.3 mg) and 2.3 (0.5 mg) VA letters and previously treated subjects had gained 1.7 (0.3 mg) and 2.3 (0.5 mg) VA letters.Intravitreal ranibizumab was safe and well tolerated in a large population of subjects with neovascular AMD. Ranibizumab had a beneficial effect on VA. Future investigations will seek to establish optimal dosing regimens for persons with neovascular AMD.Proprietary or commercial disclosure may be found after the references.Comparing treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration with sequential intravitreal Avastin and Macugen versus intravitreal mono-therapy--a pilot study.To examine if the sequential treatment of Avastin and Macugen is safe and more efficient than the mono-therapies in a prospective randomized masked pilot study.Subjects with exudative age-related macular degeneration were randomized to receive three intravitreal injections of either 1 mg of Avastin, 0.3 mg Macugen, or first 1 mg Avastin followed by retreatment of 0.3 mg Macugen. Follow-up examinations were performed after 1, 6, 12 weeks, and 6 months.Forty-eight subjects were included (13:18:17). Avastin resulted in lasting significant changes in visual acuity at 6 weeks, increase in contrast sensitivity at 6 weeks, and a significant decrease in macular thickness after 6 and 12 weeks. Macugen showed a significant decrease in retinal thickness after 6 weeks, but a significant decrease in visual acuity after 6 months, and a significant decrease in contrast sensitivity after 12 weeks and 6 months. The sequential treatment showed a decrease in retinal thickness after 1 and 12 weeks.Avastin alone is more effective in increasing visual acuity and contrast sensitivity and decreasing retinal thickness, than Macugen or the sequential treatment. We conclude that the sequential treatment of Avastin with Macugen is safe, but the single treatment of Avastin is more efficient.Contrast sensitivity outcomes in the ABC Trial: a randomized trial of bevacizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration.To report the impact of intravitreous bevacizumab therapy on contrast sensitivity in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (nAMD).This was a prospective, multicenter, double-masked, randomized, controlled trial of 131 patients with nAMD. The patients with nAMD had received intravitreal bevacizumab (n = 65) or standard therapy (n = 66) in the study eye with a 6-week cycle of assessment. The bevacizumab treatment was 1.25 mg/0.05 mL, given as three initial treatments with further retreatment as needed according to standard retreatment criteria and a 1-year (54-week) follow-up. Contrast sensitivity was determined during the study using a Pelli-Robson chart.At the week-54 examination, bevacizumab-treated patients were more likely to gain at least 6 letters or more of contrast sensitivity than the patients receiving standard care (23 [35.4%] versus 10 [15.2%], P = 0.009). In addition the bevacizumab-treated patients were less likely to lose 6 or more letters with a better mean letter change at week 54 than the patients receiving standard care (3 [4.6%] versus 14 [21.2%], and +4.0 versus -0.7 letters; P < 0.05 for both comparisons).Consistent with the visual acuity outcomes, bevacizumab improved the chances of a clinically relevant gain in contrast sensitivity in the study population. Given the association between contrast sensitivity and visual disability, the beneficial effects of bevacizumab therapy on contrast sensitivity outcomes are expected to have a favorable impact on patients' daily activities. (www.controlled-trials.com number, ISRCTN83325075.).Incidence of retinal pigment epithelial tears after intravitreal ranibizumab injection for neovascular age-related macular degeneration.To explore the association between treatment for neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD) and incidence and timing of retinal pigment epithelium (RPE) tears in ranibizumab-treated patients versus control treatment.Results from 3 phase III clinical trials (ANti-VEGF antibody for the treatment of predominantly classic CHORoidal neovascularization in age-related macular degeneration [ANCHOR], Minimally classic/occult trial of the Anti-VEGF antibody Ranibizumab In the treatment of Neovascular Age-related macular degeneration [MARINA], and A Phase IIIb, Multicenter, Randomized, Double-Masked, Sham Injection-Controlled Study of the Efficacy and Safety of Ranibizumab in Subjects with Subfoveal Choroidal Neovascularization [CNV] with or without Classic CNV Secondary to Age-Related Macular Degeneration [PIER]) were retrospectively reviewed to identify patients who developed RPE tears during the study period, detected on fluorescein angiography performed at prespecified intervals.Patients with baseline and post-baseline angiographic assessments.Patients received intravitreal ranibizumab (0.3 or 0.5 mg) or control treatment (verteporfin photodynamic therapy [PDT] in ANCHOR and sham intravitreal injections in ANCHOR, MARINA, and PIER).Incidence and timing of RPE tears during the treatment period.Data from 1298 patients were analyzed. No statistically significant differences in RPE tear incidence were observed. The pooled rate of RPE tears was 1.8% with 0.5 mg ranibizumab, 3.0% with 0.3 mg ranibizumab, and 1.6% in the control group. Most (76%; 16/21) RPE tears in ranibizumab-treated patients were identified within 3 months of initiating treatment, whereas the majority (80%; 4/5) of late-onset RPE tears occurred in control patients. In patients who developed RPE tears, better visual acuity (VA) outcomes were observed in those treated with ranibizumab versus control treatment.As studied in these trials, no statistically significant differences in the incidence of RPE tears within a 2-year treatment period were observed in patients who received ranibizumab (0.5 or 0.3 mg) versus control treatment, although most RPE tears with ranibizumab occurred within 3 months of initiating treatment. Mean VA was better in patients who developed RPE tears while receiving ranibizumab than in those who received control treatment, suggesting a potential benefit of continued ranibizumab therapy in patients with neovascular AMD who developed RPE tears.Proprietary or commercial disclosure may be found after the references.Changes in intraocular pressure in study and fellow eyes in the IVAN trial.To describe changes in intraocular pressure (IOP) in the 'alternative treatments to Inhibit VEGF in Age-related choroidal Neovascularisation (IVAN)' trial (registered as ISRCTN92166560).Randomised controlled clinical trial with factorial design.Patients (n=610) with treatment naïve neovascular age-related macular degeneration were enrolled and randomly assigned to receive either ranibizumab or bevacizumab and to two regimens, namely monthly (continuous) or as needed (discontinuous) treatment.At monthly visits, IOP was measured preinjection in both eyes, and postinjection in the study eye.The effects of 10 prespecified covariates on preinjection IOP, change in IOP (postinjection minus preinjection) and the difference in preinjection IOP between the two eyes were examined.For every month in trial, there was a statistically significant rise in both the preinjection IOP and the change in IOP postinjection during the time in the trial (estimate 0.02 mm Hg, 95% CI 0.01 to 0.03, p<0.001 and 0.03 mm Hg, 95% CI 0.01 to 0.04, p=0.002, respectively). There was also a small but significant increase during the time in trial in the difference in IOP between the two eyes (estimate 0.01 mm Hg, 95% CI 0.005 to 0.02, p<0.001). There were no differences between bevacizumab and ranibizumab for any of the three outcomes (p=0.93, p=0.22 and p=0.87, respectively).Anti-vascular endothelial growth factor agents induce increases in IOP of small and uncertain clinical significance.ISRCTN92166560.Bevacizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration in China.To evaluate 2 different dosing regimens of intravitreal bevacizumab for the treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD) patients in China.Multicenter, randomized, prospective, open-label clinical trial.One hundred eighty-five patients with active neovascular AMD, exclusion of a macular scar, choroidal neovascularization not resulting from AMD, and polypoidal choroidal vasculopathy.Patients were assigned randomly to receive intravitreal injections of bevacizumab every 6 weeks for the first 3 injections followed by injections every 6 weeks (regimen A, n = 91) or every 12 weeks (regimen B, n = 94).The primary outcome measure was a comparison of the mean change in visual acuity from baseline. The secondary outcome measure was a comparison of the proportion of patients with a change in visual acuity of 15 letters or more. Adverse events were monitored.One-hundred eighty five patients were enrolled. At 48 weeks, the increase in the mean visual acuity measurements from baseline were 12.58 letters in regimen A and 10.06 letters in regimen B (P = 0.288). At 48 weeks, the percentage of eyes losing fewer than 15 letters was 96.2% in regimen A and 93.9% in regimen B (P = 0.720). At 48 weeks, the median decrease in central retinal thickness measurements from baseline was 119 μm in regimen A and 60 μm in regimen B (P = 0.221). Adverse events during the 48 weeks included anterior chamber inflammation in 17 patients (18.7%) from regimen A and 9 patients (9.6%) from regimen B (P = 0.075). There were no other notable ocular adverse events in either group.Intravitreal bevacizumab improved visual acuity and decreased macular thickness in patients with neovascular AMD when dosed either every 6 weeks or every 12 weeks after 3 doses given at 6-week intervals. Although there were no statistically significant differences between the 2 regimens, the results tended to favor the group dosed every 6 weeks (regimen A).Intravitreal bevacizumab vs verteporfin photodynamic therapy for neovascular age-related macular degeneration.To compare verteporfin photodynamic therapy (PDT) with intravitreal bevacizumab for management of choroidal neovascularization (CNV) associated with age-related macular degeneration.Patients with predominantly classic CNV were prospectively randomized to receive standard PDT or intravitreal bevacizumab injections (2.5 mg). Best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA) measured by Snellen charts, central retinal thickness by optical coherence tomography, and greatest linear dimension of the CNV by fluorescein angiography were compared between the groups at baseline and at 3 and 6 months. Main outcome measures were stability or improvement in BCVA, decrease in central retinal thickness, and stability in greatest linear dimension.Mean baseline BCVA, central retinal thickness, and greatest linear dimension were not statistically different between the bevacizumab (n = 32) and PDT (n = 30) groups. Mean central retinal thickness was significantly better at 3 and 6 months in the bevacizumab group vs the PDT group (P = .04 and P = .002, respectively). At 3 months, mean BCVA and greatest linear dimension were not significantly different between the 2 groups. At 6 months, mean BCVA and greatest linear dimension were significantly better in the bevacizumab group (P < .001 and P = .02, respectively).During 6 months, intravitreal bevacizumab was superior to PDT in controlling predominantly classic CNV in age-related macular degeneration. Additional randomized clinical trials are necessary to determine if this benefit will remain with longer follow-up.[Treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration with intravitreal vascular endothelial growth factor inhibitor--secondary publication].Subfoveal neovascularization is the most frequent cause of severe visual loss in patients with age-related macular degeneration (AMD). Pharmacologic inhibition of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) is a new principle of treatment of this condition. The effects of intravitreal pegaptanib administered every sixth week for 48 weeks in three different dosages were examined in a prospective, double-masked, randomised trial against subconjunctival sham injection with change in visual acuity as the outcome parameter in 1,186 patients with subfoveal neovacularization in AMD. 70% of the patients treated with pegaptanib avoided moderate visual loss, compared to only 55% of the control group (p < 0.001 for 0.3 mg pegaptanib versus the control group, p < 0.001 for 1.0 mg and p = 0,03 for 3.0 mg). The improved visual prognosis was detectable beginning six weeks after the first injection (p < 0.002). Adverse events included endophthalmitis (1.3% of patients), traumatic lens damage (0.7%), retinal detachment (0.6%) and severe visual loss in one patient (0.1%). Intravitreal pegaptanib improves the visual prognosis in neovascular AMD. The long-term effect and safety of the treatment are not known.Ranibizumab versus verteporfin photodynamic therapy for neovascular age-related macular degeneration: Two-year results of the ANCHOR study.The 2-year, phase III trial designated Anti-vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) Antibody for the Treatment of Predominantly Classic Choroidal Neovascularization (CNV) in Age-related Macular Degeneration (ANCHOR) compared ranibizumab with verteporfin photodynamic therapy (PDT) in treating predominantly classic CNV.Multicenter, international, randomized, double-masked, active-treatment-controlled clinical trial.Patients with predominantly classic, subfoveal CNV not previously treated with PDT or antiangiogenic drugs.Patients were randomized 1:1:1 to verteporfin PDT plus monthly sham intraocular injection or to sham verteporfin PDT plus monthly intravitreal ranibizumab (0.3 mg or 0.5 mg) injection. The need for PDT (active or sham) retreatment was evaluated every 3 months using fluorescein angiography (FA).The primary, intent-to-treat efficacy analysis was at 12 months, with continued measurements to month 24. Key measures included the percentage losing <15 letters from baseline visual acuity (VA) score (month 12 primary efficacy outcome measure), percentage gaining >or=15 letters from baseline, and mean change over time in VA score and FA-assessed lesion characteristics. Adverse events were monitored.Of 423 patients (143 PDT, 140 each in the 2 ranibizumab groups), the majority (>or=77% in each group) completed the 2-year study. Consistent with results at month 12, at month 24 the VA benefit from ranibizumab was statistically significant (P<0.0001 vs. PDT) and clinically meaningful: 89.9% to 90.0% of ranibizumab-treated patients had lost <15 letters from baseline (vs. 65.7% of PDT patients); 34% to 41.0% had gained >or=15 letters (vs. 6.3% of PDT group); and, on average, VA was improved from baseline by 8.1 to 10.7 letters (vs. a mean decline of 9.8 letters in PDT group). Changes in lesion anatomic characteristics on FA also favored ranibizumab (all comparisons P<0.0001 vs. PDT). Overall, there was no imbalance among groups in rates of serious ocular and nonocular adverse events. In the pooled ranibizumab groups, 3 of 277 (1.1%) patients developed presumed endophthalmitis in the study eye (rate per injection = 3/5921 [0.05%]).In this 2-year study, ranibizumab provided greater clinical benefit than verteporfin PDT in patients with age-related macular degeneration with new-onset, predominantly classic CNV. Rates of serious adverse events were low.Proprietary or commercial disclosure may be found after the references.[Pegaptanib sodium one-year treatment study for neovascular age-related macular degeneration].To evaluate the safety and efficacy of intravitreal administration of pegaptanib sodium in Japanese patients with age-related macular degeneration associated with subfoveal choroidal neovascularization.Ninety-five male and female patients (mean age 72.5 years.) were assigned randomly in a double-masked manner to receive 0.3 or 1 mg of pegaptanib sodium every 6 weeks over a 48-week period. Efficacy was assessed by visual acuity change from baseline as the proportion of patients who lost fewer than 15 letters at week 54 using the Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study chart.The group that received 0.3 mg pegaptanib experienced a mean loss of 3.8 letters; 78.7% (37/47) of patients lost fewer than 15 letters. The 1 mg group had a change of -4.3 letters and the proportion that lost 15 letters was 72.9% (35/48). The proportion of patients whose visual acuity was unchanged or improved was 46.8% (22/47) and 43.8% (21/48) in the 0.3 and 1 mg groups, respectively. The majority of adverse events with possible, probable, or unknown relationship to pegaptanib were related to the intravitreal injection, such as mild conjunctival hemorrhage (0.3 mg: 76.6%, 1 mg: 77.1%) and superficial punctuate keratitis by sterilization (0.3 mg: 29.8%, 1 mg: 39.6%) at the injection site. Compliance with the study treatment of 9 intravitre al injections was as high as 87.2% and 85.4% for patients receiving 0.3 and 1 mg, respectively.Intravitreal injection of sodium pegaptanib every 6 weeks produced clinically significant stabilization of visual acuity for one year in more than 70% of patients with age-related macular degeneration, with good treatment compliance.Comparative role of intravitreal ranibizumab versus bevacizumab in choroidal neovascular membrane in age-related macular degeneration.Ranibizumab and bevacizumab are used widely for treating patients with choroidal neovascular membrane (CNVM) secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD).To determine and compare the efficacy and safety of intravitreal ranibizumab and bevacizumab in treatment of CNVM due to AMD.Prospective comparative case series carried out in an eye institute and eye department of a hospital in Kolkata, India.One hundred and four eyes with CNVM due to AMD were randomized into two groups. Group A (n=54; 24 occult) received monthly intravitreal ranibizumab injections (0.5 mg in 0.05 ml) and Group B (n=50; 22 occult) received monthly bevacizumab injections (1.25 mg in 0.05 ml) for 3 consecutive months and then as per study criteria. Data analysis done using SPSS software. P-value of <0.05 was considered statistically significant.The mean best corrected visual acuity (BCVA) in the ranibizumab group increased from 58.19 Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study (ETDRS) letters at baseline to 64 ETDRS letters at month 3 (P<0.001). In bevacizumab group mean BCVA increased from 56.80 to 61.72 ETDRS letters at month 3 (P<0.001). At the end of 18 months, there was no statistically significant difference between groups A and B with respect to change in BCVA (P=0.563) or central macular thickness (CMT; P=0.281), as measured by optical coherence tomography (Stratus OCT 3000). No significant sight-threatening complications developed.Ranibizumab and bevacizumab are equally safe and efficacious in treating CNVM due to AMD.Assessment of differential pharmacodynamic effects using optical coherence tomography in neovascular age-related macular degeneration.To use novel OCT parameters in assessing the differential pharmacodynamic effects of bevacizumab (Avastin; Genentech, South San Francisco, CA), pegaptanib (Macugen; OSI Pharmaceuticals, New York, NY), and verteporfin photodynamic therapy (PDT; Novartis, Basel, Switzerland) in a recently completed phase III/IV clinical trial.Data from 122 patients participating in the Avastin (Bevacizumab) for Choroidal Neovascularization (ABC) trial, were evaluated. OCT scans were analyzed with custom software. Changes in the volume of the neurosensory retina, amount of subretinal fluid (SRF), pigment epithelium detachment (PED), and subretinal tissue (SRT), were calculated over the 54-week trial period.Reductions in retinal edema were more than twice as great from bevacizumab as from pegaptanib (-0.82 mm³ vs. -0.31 mm³), whereas SRF reduction was more than three times greater (-0.54 mm³ vs. -0.15 mm³. Both bevacizumab and pegaptanib led to rapid reductions in SRT; however, in those receiving pegaptanib, these improvements were not maintained (at week 54, -0.22 mm³ vs. +0.18 mm³). Acute increases in SRF were seen 1 week after PDT (+0.36 mm³) and, across all treatment groups, PED volume tended to remain unchanged or to regress only slowly.In clinical trials, quantitative OCT subanalysis increases the amount of clinically useful information that can be obtained from OCT images. In the emerging era of neovascular AMD therapeutics, the capacity of OCT to provide such detailed pharmacodynamic information in a noninvasive manner is likely to attain increased importance. In future comparative studies, evaluation of SRT may highlight differential effects on vascular proliferation, whereas measurement of PED volume may be useful for the estimation of retinal and subretinal pigment epithelium (RPE) therapeutic penetration. (ClinicalTrials.gov number, ISRCTN83325075.).Postinjection endophthalmitis in the comparison of age-related macular degeneration treatments trials (CATT).To describe the incidence and outcomes of endophthalmitis after intravitreal injections of anti-vascular endothelial growth factor agents in the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials (CATT) and to assess the effect of prophylactic topical antimicrobials on incidence.Cohort study within a randomized clinical trial.Patients enrolled in CATT.Patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration received intravitreal injections of ranibizumab or bevacizumab under 1 of 3 dosing regimens. The study protocol specified preinjection preparation to include use of a sterile lid speculum and povidone iodine (5%). Use of preinjection and postinjection antibiotics was at the discretion of the treating ophthalmologist. Patients were followed up monthly for 2 years.Development of endophthalmitis and visual acuity.Endophthalmitis developed after 11 of 18 509 injections (1 per 1700 [0.06%]; 95% confidence interval, 0.03%-0.11%), and in 11 of 1185 patients (0.93%; 95% confidence interval, 0.52-1.66). Incidence of endophthalmitis was 0.15% among injections with no antibiotic use, 0.08% among injections with preinjection antibiotics only, 0.06% among injections with postinjection antibiotics only, and 0.04% among injections with preinjection and postinjection antibiotics (P = 0.20). All eyes were treated with intravitreal antibiotics and 4 underwent vitrectomy. Among the 11 affected eyes, the final study visual acuity was 20/40 or better in 4 eyes (36%), 20/50 to 20/80 in 2 eyes (18%), 20/100 to 20/160 in 3 eyes (27%), and worse than 20/800 in 2 eyes (18%). The final visual acuity was within 2 lines of the visual acuity before endophthalmitis in 5 eyes (45%).Rates of endophthalmitis were low and similar to those in other large-scale studies. Use of topical antibiotics either before or after injection does not seem to reduce the risk for endophthalmitis.Incidence of choroidal neovascularization in the fellow eye in the comparison of age-related macular degeneration treatments trials.To assess the influence of drug; dosing regimen; and traditional, nontraditional, and genetic risk factors on the incidence of choroidal neovascularization (CNV) in the fellow eye of patients treated for CNV with ranibizumab or bevacizumab.Cohort study of patients enrolled in a multicenter, randomized clinical trial.Patients with no CNV in the fellow eye at the time of enrollment in the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials (CATT).Eligibility criteria for the clinical trial required that study eyes have evidence on fluorescein angiography and optical coherence tomography of CNV secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD) and visual acuity between 20/25 and 20/320. Treatment for the study eye was assigned randomly to either ranibizumab or bevacizumab and to 3 different regimens for dosing over a 2-year period. The genotypes for 4 single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) associated with risk of AMD were determined. Only patients without CNV in the fellow eye at baseline were considered at risk. The CATT ophthalmologists examined patients every 4 weeks through 2 years and recorded treatment for CNV in the fellow eye.Development of CNV in the fellow eye.Among 1185 CATT participants, 727 (61%) had no CNV in the fellow eye at enrollment. At 2 years, CNV had developed in 75 (20.6%) of 365 patients treated with ranibizumab and in 60 (16.6%) of 362 patients treated with bevacizumab (absolute difference, 4.0%; 95% confidence interval [CI], -1.7% to 9.6%; P = 0.17). The risk ratio for pro re nata dosing relative to monthly dosing was 1.1 (95% CI, 0.8-1.6). Greater elevation of the retinal pigment epithelium and fluid in the foveal center of the study eye were associated with increased incidence of CNV in the fellow eye. Incidence was not associated with genotype on rs1061170 (CFH), rs10490924 (ARMS2), rs11200638 (HTRA1), and rs2230199 (C3; P>0.35).Through 2 years, there was no statistically significant difference between ranibizumab and bevacizumab in incidence of CNV in the fellow eye. Genotype on 4 SNPs previously found to be associated with AMD did not affect the risk of CNV in the fellow eye among CATT patients.Proprietary or commercial disclosure may be found after the references.Anatomical measures as predictors of visual outcomes in ranibizumab-treated eyes with neovascular age-related macular degeneration.To investigate if anatomical characteristics of eyes undergoing ranibizumab therapy were predictive of best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA) outcomes over 2 years.Post hoc analyses of patients with age-related macular degeneration from PIER studies, defined by fundus fluorescein angiography, quantitative optical coherence tomography (OCT), and qualitative OCT, were performed to determine if associations with BCVA outcomes could be found.Ranibizumab-treated subgroups defined by baseline fundus fluorescein angiography lesion size and composition did not differ in BCVA outcomes at month 24 (P = 0.13-1.0). Inactivity on fundus fluorescein angiography at month 3 was associated with a 12-letter gain by month 12 (P < 0.01), whereas inactivity on month 3 qualitative OCT was not (P > 0.05). Qualitative OCT inactivity at month 5 and separately at month 8 was associated with greater BCVA gains by month 24 (7.1 and 9.5 letters, respectively; P ≤ 0.045) versus eyes with OCT activity.When assessed separately, eyes with qualitative OCT (Months 5 and 8) or fundus fluorescein angiography (months 3 and 5) inactivity maintained vision gain from baseline at month 24, while those with leakage not only lost initial vision gains achieved by intraocular ranibizumab but also had net vision losses from baseline at month 24. The PIER infrequent dosing regimen likely exaggerated and accelerated the deleterious effects of retinal fluid on BCVA, and it is not known whether these findings are applicable to treatment regimens that use more frequent monitoring and dosing of ranibizumab.Pegaptanib sodium for neovascular age-related macular degeneration: two-year safety results of the two prospective, multicenter, controlled clinical trials.To evaluate the safety of pegaptanib sodium injection, a specific vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) antagonist, in the treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD) during 2 years of therapy.Two concurrent, prospective, randomized, multicenter, double-masked, sham-controlled studies.Patients with all angiographic choroidal neovascularization lesion compositions of AMD received either intravitreous pegaptanib sodium (0.3 mg, 1 mg, 3 mg) or sham injections every 6 weeks for 54 weeks. Those initially assigned to pegaptanib were re-randomized (1:1) to continue or discontinue therapy for 48 more weeks; sham-treated patients were re-randomized (1:1:1:1:1) to continue sham, discontinue, or receive one of the pegaptanib doses.All reported adverse events, serious adverse events, and deaths.In year 1, 1190 subjects received at least one study treatment (0.3 mg, n = 295; 1 mg, n = 301; 3 mg, n = 296; sham, n = 298); 7545 intravitreous injections of pegaptanib were administered. In year 2, 425 subjects (0.3 mg, n = 128; 1 mg, n = 126; 3 mg, n = 120; sham, n = 51) continued the same masked treatment as in year 1 and received at least one study treatment in year 2; 2663 intravitreous injections of pegaptanib were administered in these subjects.All doses of pegaptanib were well tolerated. The most common ocular adverse events were transient, mild to moderate in intensity, and attributed to the injection preparation and procedure. There was no evidence of an increase in deaths, in events associated with systemic VEGF inhibition (e.g., hypertension, thromboembolic events, serious hemorrhagic events), or in severe ocular inflammation, cataract progression, or glaucoma in pegaptanib-treated patients relative to sham-treated patients. In year 1, serious injection-related complications included endophthalmitis (12 events, 0.16%/injection), retinal detachment (RD) (6 events [4 rhegmatogenous, 2 exudative], 0.08%/injection), and traumatic cataract (5 events, 0.07%/injection). Most cases of endophthalmitis followed violations of the injection preparation protocol. In patients receiving pegaptanib for >1 year, there were no reports of endophthalmitis or traumatic cataract in year 2; RD was reported in 4 patients (all rhegmatogenous, 0.15%/injection).The 2-year safety profile of pegaptanib sodium is favorable in patients with exudative AMD.Clinical evaluation of pazopanib eye drops versus ranibizumab intravitreal injections in subjects with neovascular age-related macular degeneration.To evaluate pazopanib eye drops in subjects with active subfoveal choroidal neovascularization (CNV) secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Multicountry, randomized, parallel-group, double-masked, active and placebo-controlled, dose-ranging study of eye drops.A total of 510 subjects (93% white; 58% female; mean age, 75.3 years) whose AMD was previously managed by anti-vascular endothelial growth factor intravitreal injections.Treatments administered for 52 weeks included placebo eye drops instilled 4 times daily (n=73); pazopanib 5 mg/ml instilled 3 (n=72) or 4 times daily (n=74); pazopanib 10 mg/ml instilled 2 (n=73), 3 (n=73), or 4 times daily (n=72); or ranibizumab injection administered once every 4 weeks (n=73). In addition, for all eye drop treatment groups, open-label ranibizumab was administered as needed.The main outcome measures were best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA) and injection frequency assessed at week 52. Safety was assessed every 4 weeks and pazopanib plasma concentrations were determined at weeks 4 and 24.At week 52, pazopanib, with allowance for as-needed ranibizumab injections, was noninferior to monthly ranibizumab as well as to as-needed ranibizumab administered with placebo eye drops in maintaining BCVA (estimated BCVA gains of 0.3-1.8 vs. 1.4 vs. 0.2 letters, respectively). Pazopanib treatment did not reduce as-needed ranibizumab injections by ≥50% (prespecified efficacy criterion). At week 52, there were no clinically meaningful changes from baseline in retinal thickness or morphology, CNV size, or lesion characteristics on optical coherence tomography or fluorescein angiography. Complement factor H genotype had no effect on the responses to pazopanib and/or ranibizumab (BCVA, injection rate, or optical coherence tomography/fluorescein angiography changes). Steady-state concentrations of pazopanib in plasma seemed to be reached by week 4. The most common ocular adverse events related to pazopanib and ranibizumab were application site pain (3%) and injection site hemorrhage (1%), respectively. No treatment-related serious adverse events were reported.Pazopanib was well tolerated. Daily pazopanib eye drops in neovascular AMD subjects did not result in therapeutic benefit beyond that obtained with ranibizumab alone.[Antiangiogenesis therapy of age-related macular degeneration].Ranibizumab versus bevacizumab to treat neovascular age-related macular degeneration: one-year findings from the IVAN randomized trial.To compare the efficacy and safety of ranibizumab and bevacizumab intravitreal injections to treat neovascular age-related macular degeneration (nAMD).Multicenter, noninferiority factorial trial with equal allocation to groups. The noninferiority limit was 3.5 letters. This trial is registered (ISRCTN92166560).People >50 years of age with untreated nAMD in the study eye who read ≥ 25 letters on the Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study chart.We randomized participants to 4 groups: ranibizumab or bevacizumab, given either every month (continuous) or as needed (discontinuous), with monthly review.The primary outcome is at 2 years; this paper reports a prespecified interim analysis at 1 year. The primary efficacy and safety outcome measures are distance visual acuity and arteriothrombotic events or heart failure. Other outcome measures are health-related quality of life, contrast sensitivity, near visual acuity, reading index, lesion morphology, serum vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) levels, and costs.Between March 27, 2008 and October 15, 2010, we randomized and treated 610 participants. One year after randomization, the comparison between bevacizumab and ranibizumab was inconclusive (bevacizumab minus ranibizumab -1.99 letters, 95% confidence interval [CI], -4.04 to 0.06). Discontinuous treatment was equivalent to continuous treatment (discontinuous minus continuous -0.35 letters; 95% CI, -2.40 to 1.70). Foveal total thickness did not differ by drug, but was 9% less with continuous treatment (geometric mean ratio [GMR], 0.91; 95% CI, 0.86 to 0.97; P = 0.005). Fewer participants receiving bevacizumab had an arteriothrombotic event or heart failure (odds ratio [OR], 0.23; 95% CI, 0.05 to 1.07; P = 0.03). There was no difference between drugs in the proportion experiencing a serious systemic adverse event (OR, 1.35; 95% CI, 0.80 to 2.27; P = 0.25). Serum VEGF was lower with bevacizumab (GMR, 0.47; 95% CI, 0.41 to 0.54; P<0.0001) and higher with discontinuous treatment (GMR, 1.23; 95% CI, 1.07 to 1.42; P = 0.004). Continuous and discontinuous treatment costs were £9656 and £6398 per patient per year for ranibizumab and £1654 and £1509 for bevacizumab; bevacizumab was less costly for both treatment regimens (P<0.0001).The comparison of visual acuity at 1 year between bevacizumab and ranibizumab was inconclusive. Visual acuities with continuous and discontinuous treatment were equivalent. Other outcomes are consistent with the drugs and treatment regimens having similar efficacy and safety.Proprietary or commercial disclosures may be found after the references.Intravitreal bevacizumab in advanced-stage neovascular age-related macular degeneration with visual acuity lower than 20/200.Single-Chain Antibody Fragment VEGF Inhibitor RTH258 for Neovascular Age-Related Macular Degeneration: A Randomized Controlled Study.To assess the safety and efficacy of different doses of RTH258 applied as single intravitreal administration compared with ranibizumab 0.5 mg in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Six-month, phase 1/2, prospective, multicenter, double-masked, randomized, ascending single-dose, active-controlled, parallel-group study.A total of 194 treatment-naive patients, aged ≥50 years, with primary subfoveal choroidal neovascularization secondary to AMD.Patients received a single intravitreal injection of RTH258 0.5 mg (n = 11), 3.0 mg (n = 31), 4.5 mg (n = 47), or 6.0 mg (n = 44), or ranibizumab 0.5 mg (n = 61).The primary efficacy end point was the change from baseline to month 1 in central subfield thickness (CSFT) measured by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography. The secondary efficacy end point was the duration of treatment effect measured as time from the initial injection to receipt of post-baseline therapy (PBT) guided by protocol-defined criteria. Adverse events (AEs) were recorded throughout the study.RTH258 demonstrated noninferiority compared with ranibizumab in mean change in CSFT from baseline to month 1 for the 4.5- and 6.0-mg dose groups (margin: 40 μm, 1-sided alpha 0.05). The difference in CSFT change at month 1 comparison with ranibizumab was 22.86 μm (90% confidence interval [CI], -9.28 to 54.99) and 19.40 μm (95% CI, -9.00 to 47.80) for RTH258 4.5 and 6 mg, respectively. The median time to PBT after baseline therapy was 60 and 75 days for patients in the RTH258 4.5- and 6.0-mg groups, respectively, compared with 45 days for ranibizumab. Changes in best-corrected visual acuity with RTH258 were comparable to those observed with ranibizumab. The most frequent AEs reported for the RTH258 groups were conjunctival hemorrhage, eye pain, and conjunctival hyperemia; the majority of these events were mild in intensity.This first-in-human study of RTH258 demonstrated noninferiority in the change in CSFT at 1 month for the 4.5- and 6.0-mg doses compared with ranibizumab and an increase of 30 days in the median time to PBT for the 6.0-mg dose. There were no unexpected safety concerns, and the results support the continued development of RTH258 for the treatment of neovascular AMD.A variable-dosing regimen with intravitreal ranibizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration: year 2 of the PrONTO Study.To assess the long-term efficacy of a variable-dosing regimen with ranibizumab in the Prospective Optical Coherence Tomography (OCT) Imaging of Patients with Neovascular Age-Related Macular Degeneration (AMD) Treated with intraOcular Ranibizumab (PrONTO) Study, patients were followed for 2 years.A 2-year prospective, uncontrolled, variable-dosing regimen with intravitreal ranibizumab based on OCT.In this open-label, prospective, single-center, uncontrolled clinical study, AMD patients with neovascularization involving the central fovea and a central retinal thickness (CRT) of at least 300 microm as measured by OCT were enrolled to receive 3 consecutive monthly intravitreal injections of ranibizumab (0.5 mg) [Lucentis; Genentech Inc, South San Francisco, California, USA]. During the first year, retreatment with ranibizumab was performed at each monthly visit if any criterion was fulfilled such as an increase in OCT-CRT of at least 100 microm or a loss of 5 letters or more. During the second year, the retreatment criteria were amended to include retreatment if any qualitative increase in the amount of fluid was detected using OCT.Forty patients were enrolled and 37 completed the 2-year study. At month 24, the mean visual acuity (VA) improved by 11.1 letters (P < .001) and the OCT-CRT decreased by 212 microm (P < .001). VA improved by 15 letters or more in 43% of patients. These VA and OCT outcomes were achieved with an average of 9.9 injections over 24 months.The PrONTO Study using an OCT-guided variable-dosing regimen with intravitreal ranibizumab resulted in VA outcomes comparable with the outcomes from the phase III clinical studies, but fewer intravitreal injections were required.Ranibizumab combined with verteporfin photodynamic therapy in neovascular age-related macular degeneration: year 1 results of the FOCUS Study.To investigate the safety and efficacy of intravitreal ranibizumab treatment combined with verteporfin photodynamic therapy (PDT) in patients with predominantly classic choroidal neovascularization secondary to age-related macular degeneration.In this 2-year, phase I/II, multicenter, randomized, single-masked, controlled study, patients received monthly ranibizumab (0.5 mg) (n = 106) or sham (n = 56) injections. The PDT was performed 7 days before initial ranibizumab or sham treatment and then quarterly as needed.Proportion of patients losing fewer than 15 letters from baseline visual acuity at 12 months (primary efficacy outcome) and the incidence and severity of adverse events.At 12 months, 90.5% of the ranibizumab-treated patients and 67.9% of the control patients had lost fewer than 15 letters (P<.001). The most frequent ranibizumab-associated serious ocular adverse events were intraocular inflammation (11.4%) and endophthalmitis (1.9%; 4.8% if including presumed cases). On average, patients with serious inflammation had better visual acuity outcomes at 12 months than did controls. Key serious nonocular adverse events included myocardial infarctions in the PDT-alone group (3.6%) and cerebrovascular accidents in the ranibizumab-treated group (3.8%). CONCLUSION/APPLICATION TO CLINICAL PRACTICE: Ranibizumab + PDT was more efficacious than PDT alone for treating neovascular age-related macular degeneration. Although ranibizumab treatment increased the risk of serious intraocular inflammation, affected patients, on average, still experienced visual acuity benefit.Pegaptanib sodium for neovascular age-related macular degeneration: third-year safety results of the VEGF Inhibition Study in Ocular Neovascularisation (VISION) trial.To evaluate the safety of up to 3 years of pegaptanib sodium therapy in the treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration (NV-AMD).Two concurrent, prospective, multicentre, double-masked studies randomised subjects with all angiographic lesion compositions of NV-AMD to receive intravitreous pegaptanib sodium (0.3, 1 and 3 mg) or sham injections every 6 weeks for 54 weeks. Those initially assigned to pegaptanib were rerandomised to continue or discontinue therapy for 48 more weeks; sham-treated subjects continued sham, discontinued or received pegaptanib. At 102 weeks, subjects receiving pegaptanib 0.3 mg or 1 mg in years 1 or 2 continued; those receiving pegaptanib 3 mg or who did not receive treatment in years 1 and 2 were rerandomised to 0.3 mg or 1 mg for year 3.As in years 1 and 2, pegaptanib was well tolerated in year 3. Adverse events were mainly ocular in nature, mild, transient and injection-related. Serious adverse events were rare. No evidence of systemic safety signals attributed to vascular endothelial growth factor inhibition arose in year 3. There were no findings in relation to vital signs or electrocardiogram results suggesting a relationship to pegaptanib treatment.The 3-year safety profile of pegaptanib sodium was favourable in patients with NV-AMD.Cost effectiveness of pegaptanib for the treatment of age-related macular degeneration in the UK.Age-related macular degeneration (AMD) is the primary cause of vision loss in the elderly and results in significant economic and humanistic burden. The selective vascular endothelial growth factor inhibitor, pegaptanib (Macugen) is indicated for patients with neovascular AMD. Guidance is needed regarding the cost effectiveness of treatment, any variation between sub-populations of differing clinical characteristics and the optimum duration of treatment.To estimate the cost effectiveness of pegaptanib versus best supportive care (BSC) for AMD from the perspective of the UK government, and to evaluate the impact of patient characteristics and differing treatment discontinuation scenarios.A cohort of 1000 patients aged >45 years with a best-corrected visual acuity (VA) in their better-seeing eye of < or =6/12 was modelled. Patients were either treated with pegaptanib (0.3mg every 6 weeks for a maximum of 2 years in their better-seeing eye only) or received BSC (no active treatment). Supportive services were provided for patients with a VA < or =6/60. A 10-year Markov model composed of 12 VA states (defined by individual Snellen lines) and a dead state was constructed. The model reported herein was used to support submissions to the National Institute for Health and Clinical Excellence (NICE) and the Scottish Medicines Consortium (SMC). NICE guidance is expected to be available in October 2007 and the SMC advice was issued on 7 July 2006. SMC accepted pegaptanib for use in patients with visual acuity between 6/12 and 6/60 (inclusive) and should be stopped if visual acuity falls below 6/60 during treatment or where severe visual loss is experienced. Time-dependent transition probabilities for the loss and gain of Snellen lines were derived from parametric survival curves fitted to patient-level data from the VISION trials. Survival curves were fitted with treatment and baseline Snellen scores as covariates; additional curves were fitted with the addition of age, gender, lesion type or lesion size as covariates. Mortality rates were adjusted for the age, gender and VA of the population. Cost effectiveness was expressed as the incremental cost (IC) per vision-year saved and IC/QALY. Uncertainty was explored by probabilistic and univariate sensitivity analysis. Costs (year 2005 values) and outcomes were discounted at 3.5% per anum.In the base-case analysis, treatment was targeted to patients with a VA of 6/12 to 6/95 and discontinued after 2 years, or earlier if VA fell below 6/95 or by > or =6 lines. The IC/QALY was estimated as 8023 pounds(upper 95% CI 20,641 pounds). Cost effectiveness varied by age (age <75 years = 2033 pounds/QALY; age > or =75 years = 11,657 pounds/QALY) and by pre-treatment VA (6/12-6/95 = 8023 pounds/QALY; 6/12-6/60 = 6664 pounds/QALY; 6/12-6/24 = 1920 pounds/QALY). Gender and lesion type or size had little effect. Cost effectiveness was not sensitive to precise rules for treatment discontinuation, but was maximised if treatment was discontinued in patients no longer likely to benefit.The results suggest that pegaptanib treatment is likely to be cost effective across all groups studied, and marginally more cost effective in younger patients and those with better pre-treatment VA. Cost effectiveness appears to be optimised if treatment is discontinued after 1 year if individual patients' VA has dropped by > or =6 lines from pre-treatment levels, or at any time if it drops below 6/95. However, strict application of discontinuation rules does not appear to be necessary for pegaptanib to be cost effective. Clinical judgement and patient preference should be an important determinant in decisions about stopping treatment.Comparing treatments for age-related macular degeneration: safety, effectiveness and cost.Comparative effectiveness research (CER) has received widespread attention and federal funding because of its potential to inform and improve treatment decisions. Since 2005, patients and their ophthalmologists have faced a dilemma in treating age-related macular degeneration (AMD)--the leading cause of blindness in the United States. Two closely related drugs have produced dramatic improvements in vision; one has been rigorously tested for use in AMD patients, while the other has been rigorously tested for use in cancer patients, but is now widely used to treat AMD. One drug costs 40 times as much as the other. This Issue Brief summarizes a CER study comparing these drugs head-to-head, and provides the most definitive evidence to date about the safety and effectiveness of the two alternatives.Pharmacogenetic associations with vascular endothelial growth factor inhibition in participants with neovascular age-related macular degeneration in the IVAN Study.To determine if prespecified genetic polymorphisms influence responsiveness to vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) inhibition in neovascular age-related macular degeneration (nAMD). The objectives were to replicate 3 reported pharmacogenetic associations of response in nAMD and to test for novel associations.Cohort study, combining information about patients' genotypes with information from a randomized controlled trial about responsiveness to anti-VEGF therapy for nAMD.Five hundred nine participants with nAMD, enrolled in the Alternative Treatments to Inhibit VEGF in Patients with Age-Related Choroidal Neovascularisation (IVAN) trial.Participants were classified as responders or nonresponders to VEGF inhibition based on the optical coherence tomography (OCT) metric of total retinal thickness (TRT). We computed the change in TRT from baseline to the latest time point for which OCT data were available (3, 6, 9, or 12 months). Eyes with changes in TRT greater than or equal to the 75th percentile or more were classified as responders, and those with changes less than or equal to the 25th percentile or lower were classified as non-responders. Three previously reported associations of response to VEGF inhibition in nAMD involving single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) at the CFH, FZD4, and HTRA1/ARMS2 loci were tested for replication. An additional 482 SNPs also were tested using a candidate gene approach. Associations were estimated as odds ratios (ORs) with confidence intervals (CIs).The primary outcome was evidence of a genetic association with response to VEGF inhibition as measured by change in TRT.One hundred twenty-six participants were classified as responders and 128 were classified as nonresponders. The SNP rs10490924 in HTRA1/ARMS2 showed a borderline association with responsiveness after Bonferroni correction (OR, 1.53; CI, 0.99-2.36; P = 0.055, Bonferroni correction). None of the other 484 additional SNPs tested for association was significant after Bonferroni correction for multiple testing. The smallest corrected P value was 0.84 (P = 0.002, uncorrected) for rs9679290 in the EPAS1 (HIF2A) gene on chromosome 2. Four of the 10 most significant results were in this gene.We estimated pharmacogenetic associations using high-quality phenotype data from a randomized controlled clinical trial of nAMD. No significant association or replication of previous associations were observed. Further investigation of the EPAS1 (HIF2A) gene, however, may, be merited.Growth of geographic atrophy in the comparison of age-related macular degeneration treatments trials.To evaluate the growth of geographic atrophy (GA) during anti-vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) therapy.Cohort within a clinical trial.Patients included in the Comparison of Age-related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials (CATT).Participants were randomly assigned to injections of ranibizumab or bevacizumab and to a 2-year dosing regimen of monthly or pro re nata (PRN) or to monthly for 1 year and PRN the following year. Digital color photographs and fluorescein angiograms at baseline and 1 and 2 years were evaluated for GA, and the total area of GA was measured by 2 graders masked to treatment; differences were adjudicated. Multivariate linear mixed models of the annual change in the square root of the area included baseline demographic, treatment, and ocular characteristics on imaging as candidate risk factors.Geographic atrophy growth rate.Among 1185 participants, 86 (7.3%) had GA at baseline, 120 (10.1%) developed GA during year 1, and 36 (3.0%) developed GA during year 2. Among 194 eyes evaluable for growth, the rate was 0.43 mm/yr (standard error [SE], ±0.03 mm/year). In multivariate analysis, the growth rate was 0.37 mm/year in eyes receiving bevacizumab and 0.49 mm/year in eyes receiving ranibizumab (difference, 0.11 mm/yr; 95% confidence interval [CI], 0.01-0.22; P = 0.03). Growth rate did not differ between eyes treated monthly and PRN (P = 0.85). Eyes with subfoveal choroidal neovascularization (CNV) lesions had a lower growth rate than eyes with nonsubfoveal CNV lesions (difference, 0.12; 95% CI, 0.01-0.22; P = 0.03). Eyes with GA farther from the fovea had higher growth rates by 0.14 (95% CI, 0.01-27) mm/year for every millimeter farther from the fovea. The growth rate was 0.58 mm/year for eyes with predominantly classic lesions, 0.41 mm/year for eyes with minimally classic lesions, and 0.30 mm/year for eyes with occult only lesions (P < 0.01). The growth rate in eyes having a fellow eye with GA was higher by 0.13 mm/year (95% CI, 0.01-0.24; P = 0.03) than in eyes without GA in the fellow eye. Eyes with epiretinal membrane had a higher growth rate than eyes without epiretinal membrane (difference, 0.16; 95% CI, 0.03-0.30; P = 0.02).Geographic atrophy growth depends on several ocular factors. Ranibizumab may accelerate GA growth.Low fluence rate photodynamic therapy combined with intravitreal bevacizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration.To report the efficacy and safety of intravitreal bevacizumab (IVB) alone versus IVB plus low-fluence photodynamic therapy (PDT) in age-related macular degeneration (AMD) patients and to verify the occurrence of a synergistic effect of the combined approach on visual acuity, size and morphology of lesion, as well as on the treatment rate.Prospective comparative interventional study on 85 patients with treatment-naive classic, or predominantly classic, subfoveal choroidal neovascularisation secondary to AMD. Patients were randomly assigned to group 1 (IVB injections) and group 2 (IVB plus low fluence PDT). In group 2, the PDT with verteporfin was delivered with a low fluence rate (300 mW/cm2 for 83 s, 25 J/cm2). The follow-up was scheduled at 1, 3, 6, 9 and 12 months.The eye without recurrence received a mean of 2.8 (group 1) versus 1.4 (group 2) IVB injections, whereas the eyes with recurrence received a mean of 3.2 (group 1) versus 2.2 (group 2) IVB injections. The difference in reinjection rate between the two groups was statistically significant (p=0.03, ANOVA test). Visual acuity improvement was not statistically significant between the two groups (p=0.31).The combination of IVB with low fluence PDT for the treatment of classic or predominantly classic neovascular AMD works in a synergistic fashion with a significant reduction in IVB reinjections rate.Angiographic and optical coherence tomographic results of the MARINA study of ranibizumab in neovascular age-related macular degeneration.To assess pharmacodynamic responses to ranibizumab, an inhibitor of vascular endothelial growth factor A (VEGF-A), in a study of the treatment of minimally classic or occult with no classic choroidal neovascularization secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD) (designated MARINA [Minimally Classic/Occult Trial of the Anti-VEGF Antibody Ranibizumab in the Treatment of Neovascular AMD]) and to compare these responses with those in a sham-injection control group.Retrospective (prespecified and ad hoc) analyses of 24-month data.Seven hundred sixteen patients, randomized to 0.3-mg ranibizumab (n = 238), 0.5-mg ranibizumab (n = 240), or a sham injection (n = 238).Stereoscopic fundus photography and fluorescein angiography (FA) were done at baseline and months 3, 6, 12, and 24. Optical coherence tomography (OCT) was performed at a subset of investigative sites (46 patients) at baseline, day 7, and months 1 and 12.Prespecified secondary end points were mean change from baseline in total area of choroidal neovascularization and total area of leakage from choroidal neovascularization at months 12 and 24. Prespecified exploratory FA end points included mean change from baseline in the areas of the choroidal neovascularization lesion and serous sensory retinal detachment (SSRD) at months 12 and 24. Post hoc exploratory FA outcome measures included the proportion of patients with no leakage from choroidal neovascularization and mean change from baseline over time in the area of subretinal fibrous tissue/disciform scar. The prespecified exploratory end point for OCT was mean change from baseline over time in center point thickness.At 12 and 24 months, statistically significant benefits of ranibizumab over sham treatment were observed for mean change from baseline in the areas of choroidal neovascularization lesion, total choroidal neovascularization, leakage from choroidal neovascularization, SSRD, and disciform scar/subretinal fibrosis. At 12 months (final OCT), the mean change in foveal center point thickness on OCT was a significant decrease in the ranibizumab group compared with the sham group.Patients with minimally classic or occult with no classic neovascular AMD treated with ranibizumab demonstrated improvement that was consistent for visual acuity, FA, and OCT outcomes and superior to that in sham-treated patients.Characteristics of patients losing vision after 2 years of monthly dosing in the phase III ranibizumab clinical trials.To investigate the cause of visual acuity (VA) loss in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD) receiving monthly ranibizumab injections in the pivotal ranibizumab phase III trials.Retrospective analysis.The Minimally Classic/Occult Trial of the Anti-VEGF Antibody Ranibizumab In the treatment of Neovascular AMD (MARINA) and Anti-VEGF Antibody for the Treatment of Predominantly Classic Choroidal Neovascularization in AMD (ANCHOR) trials.Demographics and lesion characteristics at baseline and month 24 were compared in patients with ≥15 letters VA loss and patients with ≥15 letters VA gain from baseline to month 24. Additional evaluations of fundus photographs from these patients were performed to assess features of non-exudative AMD, such as geographic atrophy (GA) and retinal pigment epithelium (RPE) abnormalities.Differences in lesion characteristics between patients who lost versus gained ≥15 letters of VA from baseline to month 24.At month 24, 9% of ranibizumab-treated patients from MARINA and 10% of ranibizumab-treated patients from ANCHOR had lost ≥15 letters VA; 30% of ranibizumab-treated patients from MARINA and 38% of ranibizumab-treated patients from ANCHOR had gained ≥15 letters VA. Baseline characteristics associated with VA loss at month 24 included older age, better VA, and larger lesions. At month 24, an increased area of RPE abnormality was associated with VA loss in both the MARINA (P = 0.0008) and ANCHOR (P = 0.0046) trials. Increased total lesion area at month 24 was associated with VA loss in both trials. In MARINA, the increase in total lesion area was attributable to an increase in the angiographic designation of atrophic scar among VA losers (P = 0.0043), but in ANCHOR it was attributable to an increased area of choroidal neovascularization (CNV) (P = 0.039) but not an increased area of leakage (P = 0.17). Increased areas of GA, fibrosis, and hemorrhage were not associated with VA loss.Vision loss after 2 years of monthly ranibizumab therapy was associated with lesion characteristics commonly associated with suppressed CNV, such as pigmentary abnormalities, atrophic scar, and the absence of leakage. Future VA improvements in patients receiving ranibizumab therapy may require preservation of photoreceptor and RPE function rather than strategies that target CNV.Ranibizumab and bevacizumab for treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration: two-year results.To describe effects of ranibizumab and bevacizumab when administered monthly or as needed for 2 years and to describe the impact of switching to as-needed treatment after 1 year of monthly treatment.Multicenter, randomized clinical trial.Patients (n = 1107) who were followed up during year 2 among 1185 patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration who were enrolled in the clinical trial.At enrollment, patients were assigned to 4 treatment groups defined by drug (ranibizumab or bevacizumab) and dosing regimen (monthly or as needed). At 1 year, patients initially assigned to monthly treatment were reassigned randomly to monthly or as-needed treatment, without changing the drug assignment.Mean change in visual acuity.Among patients following the same regimen for 2 years, mean gain in visual acuity was similar for both drugs (bevacizumab-ranibizumab difference, -1.4 letters; 95% confidence interval [CI], -3.7 to 0.8; P = 0.21). Mean gain was greater for monthly than for as-needed treatment (difference, -2.4 letters; 95% CI, -4.8 to -0.1; P = 0.046). The proportion without fluid ranged from 13.9% in the bevacizumab-as-needed group to 45.5% in the ranibizumab monthly group (drug, P = 0.0003; regimen, P < 0.0001). Switching from monthly to as-needed treatment resulted in greater mean decrease in vision during year 2 (-2.2 letters; P = 0.03) and a lower proportion without fluid (-19%; P < 0.0001). Rates of death and arteriothrombotic events were similar for both drugs (P > 0.60). The proportion of patients with 1 or more systemic serious adverse events was higher with bevacizumab than ranibizumab (39.9% vs. 31.7%; adjusted risk ratio, 1.30; 95% CI, 1.07-1.57; P = 0.009). Most of the excess events have not been associated previously with systemic therapy targeting vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF).Ranibizumab and bevacizumab had similar effects on visual acuity over a 2-year period. Treatment as needed resulted in less gain in visual acuity, whether instituted at enrollment or after 1 year of monthly treatment. There were no differences between drugs in rates of death or arteriothrombotic events. The interpretation of the persistence of higher rates of serious adverse events with bevacizumab is uncertain because of the lack of specificity to conditions associated with inhibition of VEGF.Ranibizumab versus Bevacizumab for Neovascular Age-related Macular Degeneration: Results from the GEFAL Noninferiority Randomized Trial.To evaluate the relative efficacy and safety profile of bevacizumab versus ranibizumab intravitreal injections for the treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Multicenter, prospective, noninferiority, double-masked, randomized clinical trial performed in 38 French ophthalmology centers. The noninferiority limit was 5 letters.Patients aged ≥50 years were eligible if they presented with subfoveal neovascular AMD, with best-corrected visual acuity (BVCA) in the study eye of between 20/32 and 20/320 measured on the Early Treatment of Diabetic Retinopathy Study chart and a lesion area of less than 12 optic disc areas (DA).Patients were randomly assigned to intravitreal administration of bevacizumab (1.25 mg) or ranibizumab (0.50 mg). Hospital pharmacies were responsible for preparing, blinding, and dispensing treatments. Patients were followed for 1 year, with a loading dose of 3 monthly intravitreal injections, followed by an as-needed regimen (1 injection in case of active disease) for the remaining 9 months with monthly follow-up.Mean change in visual acuity at 1 year.Between June 2009 and November 2011, 501 patients were randomized. In the per protocol analysis, bevacizumab was noninferior to ranibizumab (bevacizumab minus ranibizumab +1.89 letters; 95% confidence interval [CI], -1.16 to +4.93, P < 0.0001). The intention-to-treat analysis was concordant. The mean number of injections was 6.8 in the bevacizumab group and 6.5 in the ranibizumab group (P = 0.39). Both drugs reduced the central subfield macular thickness, with a mean decrease of 95 μm for bevacizumab and 107 μm for ranibizumab (P = 0.27). There were no significant differences in the presence of subretinal or intraretinal fluid at final evaluation, dye leakage on angiogram, or change in choroidal neovascular area. The proportion of patients with serious adverse events was 12.6% in the bevacizumab group and 12.1% in the ranibizumab group (P = 0.88). The proportion of patients with serious systemic or ocular adverse events was similar in both groups.Bevacizumab was noninferior to ranibizumab for visual acuity at 1 year with similar safety profiles. Ranibizumab tended to have a better anatomic outcome. The results are similar to those of previous head-to-head studies.Improved vision-related function after ranibizumab vs photodynamic therapy: a randomized clinical trial.To compare patient-reported visual function in those with neovascular age-related macular degeneration treated with ranibizumab or verteporfin photodynamic therapy (PDT).Multicenter, double-masked, phase 3 trial (ANCHOR). Participants were randomized in a 1:1:1 ratio to receive 0.3 or 0.5 mg of intravitreal ranibizumab plus sham verteporfin or sham injections plus active verteporfin monthly. The National Eye Institute Visual Function Questionnaire-25 (NEI VFQ-25) was administered at baseline and 1, 2, 3, 6, 9, 12, 18, and 24 months.Mean change from baseline in NEI VFQ-25 scores at 12 months.At 12 months, patients treated with ranibizumab (0.3 mg [n = 137] or 0.5 mg [n = 139]) had mean improvements in NEI VFQ-25 composite scores of 5.9 (95% confidence interval [CI], 3.6 to 8.3) and 8.1 (95% CI, 5.3 to 10.8) points, respectively; patients treated with PDT (n = 142) had a mean improvement of 2.2 points (95% CI, -0.3 to 4.7; vs 0.5 mg of ranibizumab, P < .001; vs 0.3 mg of ranibizumab, P = .003). At each dose through 24 months, patients treated with ranibizumab were more likely to improve in most subscales, including the prespecified subscales (near activities, distance activities, and vision-specific dependency).Patients treated with ranibizumab were more likely to report clinically meaningful improvements in visual function through 24 months compared with those treated with verteporfin PDT. Application to Clinical Practice Ranibizumab treatment in neovascular age-related macular degeneration can improve patient-reported visual function. Trial Registration clinicaltrials.gov Identifier: NCT00061594.A phase I trial of an IV-administered vascular endothelial growth factor trap for treatment in patients with choroidal neovascularization due to age-related macular degeneration.To assess the safety, pharmacokinetics, and biological activity of IV administration of vascular endothelial growth factor trap (VEGF Trap), a recombinant protein containing the binding domains of VEGF receptors 1 and 2, in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Randomized, multicenter, placebo-controlled clinical trial.Twenty-five patients were enrolled (11 male, 14 female); 19 received VEGF Trap (0.3 [n = 7], 1.0 [n = 7], or 3.0 mg/kg [n = 5]), and 6 received a placebo.Patients were randomized to receive a placebo or 0.3-, 1.0-, or 3.0-mg/kg VEGF Trap--a single IV dose followed by a 4-week observation period and then 3 doses 2 weeks apart.Safety and biological activity, including change in excess retinal thickness and volume assessed by optical coherence tomography and visual acuity (VA) measured by the Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study protocol.The majority of adverse events attributable to VEGF Trap were mild to moderate in severity, but 2 of 5 patients treated with 3.0 mg/kg experienced dose-limiting toxicity (1 with grade 4 hypertension and 1 with grade 2 proteinuria); therefore, all patients in the 3.0 mg/kg-dose group were withdrawn from the study. The mean percent changes in excess retinal thickness were -12%, -10%, -66%, and -60%, respectively, for the placebo and 0.3-, 1.0-, and 3.0-mg/kg groups at day 15 (P<0.02 by analysis of covariance [ANCOVA]) and -5.6%, +47.1%, and -63.3% for the placebo and 0.3- and 1.0-mg/kg groups at day 71 (P<0.02, ANCOVA). A significant change in VA was not noted in this small study.The maximum tolerated dose of IV VEGF Trap in this study population was 1.0 mg/kg. This dose resulted in elimination of about 60% of excess retinal thickness after either single or multiple administrations. Alternative routes of delivery to increase the therapeutic window are being explored.Anatomical benefit from ranibizumab treatment of predominantly classic neovascular age-related macular degeneration in the 2-year anchor study.To compare lesion anatomical responses to ranibizumab versus verteporfin photodynamic therapy (PDT) in the ANCHOR (Anti-VEGF Antibody for the Treatment of Predominantly Classic Choroidal Neovascularization [CNV] in Age-Related Macular Degeneration) study.In this 2-year, Phase III, randomized, multicenter, double-masked trial, 423 patients received ranibizumab (0.3 or 0.5 mg) monthly + sham PDT or PDT + monthly sham injection. Photodynamic therapy (or sham PDT) was administered at Day 0 and then quarterly as needed. A central reading center assessed fundus photography and fluorescein angiography images. A subset (n = 61) had optical coherence tomography assessments. Main outcome measures included mean change from baseline at Months 12 and 24 for area of classic CNV and total area of leakage from CNV.At Months 12 and 24, ranibizumab was superior to PDT (P < 0.0001) for mean changes from baseline in total area of lesion, CNV area, and total area CNV leakage. Month 12 optical coherence tomographies showed greater center point thickness decrease from baseline with ranibizumab than with PDT (P = 0.0003). Ranibizumab benefits over PDT were evident by 3 months (fluorescein angiography) and 7 days (optical coherence tomography).Differences between the PDT and the ranibizumab groups in lesion anatomical outcomes were early, sustained, and favored ranibizumab.[Monotherapy of exudative age-related macular degeneration with ranibizumab in patients at cardiovascular risk. Advantages of ranibizumab compared to a combination with pegaptanib].Intravitreal ranibizumab (Lucentis®) and pegaptanib (Macugen®) are effective treatment options for exudative age-related macular degeneration (AMD). There might be some differences regarding effectiveness (higher with ranibizumab) and safety issues (presumed to be higher with pegaptanib), which led to the question whether these advantages might be combined. To clarify this question the current study was performed.All patients treated for exudative AMD between February 2007 and May 2010 were evaluated for a potential cardiovascular risk profile. Patients with a positive history of coronary heart disease, proven by medical treatment, history of myocardial infarction, stent implantation or bypass operation or a history of stroke were classified as risk patients, while others without such a history were classified as non-risk patients. Risk patients were treated with a combination therapy (first injection: ranibizumab, second and third injections pegaptanib--combination group) when presenting between February 2008 and September 2009 or standard care (first, second and third injections ranibizumab--standard group) during upload. All patients were evaluated for best-corrected visual acuity on the day of diagnosis, injections during the upload phase and first follow-up visit after upload.Both groups did no differ regarding age, gender, subtype of choroidal neovascularization or waiting time between first visit and first injection. Visual acuity changes showed no differences up to the third injection and control visit. Visual acuity continued to improve within the standard group but rapidly declined in the combination group.Even patients at risk for cardiovascular accidents should not be treated with a combination therapy of ranibizumab and pegaptanib as this combination results in a decline of visual acuity during upload.Angiographic Cystoid Macular Edema and Outcomes in the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials.To describe morphologic and visual outcomes in eyes with angiographic cystoid macular edema (CME) treated with ranibizumab or bevacizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration (nAMD).Prospective cohort study within a randomized clinical trial.A total of 1185 CATT study subjects.Baseline fluorescein angiography (FA) images of all CATT study eyes were evaluated for CME. Grading of other characteristics on optical coherence tomography (OCT) and photographic images at baseline and during 2-year follow-up was completed by readers at the CATT Reading Centers. Three groups were created on the basis of baseline CME and intraretinal fluid (IRF) status: (1) CME, (2) IRF without CME, (3) neither CME nor IRF.Visual acuity (VA) and total central retinal thickness (CRT) on OCT at baseline, year 1, and year 2.Among 1131 participants with images of sufficient quality for determining CME and IRF at baseline, 92 (8.1%) had CME, 766 (67.7%) had IRF without CME, and 273 (24.1%) had neither. At baseline, eyes with CME had worse mean VA (letters) than eyes with IRF without CME and eyes with neither CME nor IRF (52 vs. 60 vs. 66 letters, P < 0.001); higher mean total CRT (μm) on OCT (514 vs. 472 vs. 404, P < 0.001); and greater hemorrhage, retinal angiomatous proliferation (RAP) lesions, and classic choroidal neovascularization (CNV). All groups showed improvement in VA at follow-up; however, the CME group started and ended with the worst VA among the 3 groups. Central retinal thickness, although higher at baseline for the CME group, was similar at 1 and 2 years follow-up for all groups. More eyes with CME (65.3%) developed scarring during 2 years of follow-up compared with eyes with IRF without CME (43.8%) and eyes with neither CME nor IRF (32.5%; P < 0.001).In CATT, eyes with CME had worse baseline and follow-up VA, although all groups showed similar rates of improvement in VA during 2 years of follow-up. Cystoid macular edema seems to be a marker for poorer visual outcomes in nAMD because of underlying baseline retinal dysfunction and subsequent scarring.Cost-effectiveness of ranibizumab compared with pegaptanib in neovascular age-related macular degeneration.To assess the cost-effectiveness of ranibizumab compared with pegaptanib in the treatment of patients with minimally classic/occult neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD), from a societal perspective in Spain.We constructed a Markov model with five states defined by visual acuity (VA) in the better-seeing eye (Snellen scale): VA >20/40, < or =20/40 to >20/80, < or =20/80 to >20/200, < or =20/200 to >20/400, < or =20/400, and an additional death state. Two cohorts of patients were distributed along the VA states, and treated with either ranibizumab or pegaptanib. Transition probabilities assigned for movement between these states with both drugs were obtained from published randomized clinical trials. Medical costs related to AMD treatment and follow-up, medical costs related to AMD comorbidities, and non-medical-related costs were taken into account. Costs (2008 Euro), health outcomes (Quality-adjusted life years--QALYs), both discounted at a 3.5% annual rate, and incremental cost-effectiveness ratios (ICER: euro/QALY), were determined for a lifetime horizon in the base case analysis. Sensitivity analyses were conducted to explore different scenarios and assumptions in the model.Treating patients with varying degrees of visual impairment with monthly ranibizumab instead of pegaptanib was 71,206 euro more costly and provided 2.437 additional QALYs (29,224 euro/QALY). When administered on an as-needed basis, as in the Prospective Optical Coherence Tomography Imaging of Patients with Neovascular AMD Treated with Intraocular Ranibizumab (PrONTO) trial, the cost per QALY gained with ranibizumab was reduced to 4,623 euro.The cost per QALY gained with monthly ranibizumab compared with pegaptanib in the minimally classic/occult neovascular AMD population is just below the 30,000 euro threshold below which new drugs are sometimes regarded as cost-effective strategies in Spain. In this model, the key variables with greater impact on the cost-effectiveness results were the selected time horizon and the chosen extrapolation method, the source for data on pegaptanib efficacy and the number of ranibizumab injections. When administered on an as-needed basis, ranibizumab was a cost-effective strategy compared to pegaptanib in this population.Year 2 efficacy results of 2 randomized controlled clinical trials of pegaptanib for neovascular age-related macular degeneration.To evaluate the efficacy of a second year of pegaptanib sodium therapy in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Two concurrent, multicenter, randomized, double-masked, sham-controlled studies (V.I.S.I.O.N. [Vascular Endothelial Growth Factor Inhibition Study in Ocular Neovascularization] trials).Patients with all angiographic neovascular lesion compositions of AMD were enrolled. In combined analyses, 88% (1053/1190) were re-randomized at week 54, and 89% (941/1053) were assessed at week 102.At week 54, those initially assigned to pegaptanib were re-randomized (1:1) to continue or discontinue therapy for 48 more weeks (8 injections). Those initially assigned to sham were re-randomized to continue sham, discontinue sham, or receive 1 of 3 pegaptanib doses.Mean change in visual acuity (VA) over time and mean change in the standardized area under the curve of VA and proportions of patients experiencing a loss of > or =15 letters from week 54 to week 102; losing <15 letters (responders) from baseline to week 102; gaining > or =0, > or =1, > or =2, and > or =3 lines of VA; and progressing to legal blindness (20/200 or worse).In combined analysis, mean VA was maintained in patients continuing with 0.3-mg pegaptanib compared with those discontinuing therapy or receiving usual care. In patients who continued pegaptanib, the proportion who lost >15 letters from baseline in the period from week 54 to week 102 was half (7%) that of patients who discontinued pegaptanib or remained on usual care (14% for each). Kaplan-Meier analysis showed that patients continuing 0.3-mg pegaptanib for a second year were less likely to lose > or =15 letters than those re-randomized to discontinue after 1 year (P<0.05). The proportion of patients gaining vision was higher for those assigned to 2 years of 0.3-mg pegaptanib than receiving usual care. Progression to legal blindness was reduced for patients continuing 0.3-mg pegaptanib for 2 years.Continuing visual benefit was observed in patients who were randomized to receive therapy with pegaptanib in year 2 of the V.I.S.I.O.N. trials when compared with 2 years' usual care or cessation of therapy at year 1.Randomized, double-masked, sham-controlled trial of ranibizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration: PIER study year 2.To evaluate efficacy and safety of quarterly (and then monthly) ranibizumab during the 2-year Phase IIIb, multicenter, randomized, double-masked, sham injection-controlled study of the efficacy and safety of ranibizumab in subjects with subfoveal CNV with or without classic CNV secondary to AMD (PIER) study.Phase IIIb, multicenter, randomized, double-masked, sham injection-controlled trial in patients with choroidal neovascularization (CNV) secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Patients were randomized 1:1:1 to sham injection (n = 63) or 0.3 mg (n = 60) or 0.5 mg (n = 61) intravitreal ranibizumab monthly for 3 months and then quarterly. During study year 2, eligible sham-group patients crossed over to 0.5 mg ranibizumab quarterly. Later in year 2, all eligible randomized patients rolled over to 0.5 mg ranibizumab monthly. Key efficacy and safety outcomes of the 2-year trial are reported.At month 24, visual acuity (VA) had decreased an average of 21.4, 2.2, and 2.3 letters from baseline in the sham, 0.3 mg, and 0.5 mg groups (P < .0001 for each ranibizumab group vs sham). VA of sham patients who crossed over (and subsequently rolled over) to ranibizumab decreased across time, with an average loss of 3.5 letters 10 months after crossover. VA of 0.3 mg and 0.5 mg group patients who rolled over to monthly ranibizumab increased for an average gain of 2.2 and 4.1 letters, respectively, 4 months after rollover. The ocular safety profile of ranibizumab was favorable and consistent with previous reports.Ranibizumab provided significant VA benefit in patients with AMD-related CNV compared with sham injection. Ranibizumab appeared to provide additional VA benefit to treated patients who rolled over to monthly dosing, but not to patients who began receiving ranibizumab after >14 months of sham injections.Outcomes of eyes with lesions composed of >50% blood in the Comparison of Age-related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials (CATT).To compare baseline characteristics, treatment frequency, visual acuity (VA), and morphologic outcomes of eyes with >50% of the lesion composed of blood (B50 group) versus all other eyes (Other group) enrolled in the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials (CATT).Prospective cohort study within a multicenter randomized clinical trial.CATT patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Treatment for the study eye was assigned randomly to either ranibizumab or bevacizumab and to 3 different dosing regimens over a 2-year period. Reading center graders evaluated baseline and follow-up morphology in color fundus photographs, fluorescein angiography (FA), and optical coherence tomography (OCT). Masked examiners tested VA.Morphologic features and VA at 1 and 2 years.The B50 group consisted of 84 of 1185 (7.1%) patients enrolled in CATT. Baseline lesion characteristics differed between groups. In the B50 group, choroidal neovascularization size was smaller (0.73 vs 1.83 disc areas [DA]; P < 0.001), total lesion size was greater (4.55 vs 2.31 DA; P <0.001), total retinal thickness was greater (524 vs 455 μm; P = 0.02), and mean VA was worse (56.0 vs 60.9 letters; P = 0.002). Increases in mean VA were similar in the B50 and Other groups at 1 year (+9.3 vs +7.2 letters; P = 0.22) and at 2 years (9.0 vs 6.1 letters; P = 0.17). Eyes treated PRN received a similar number of injections in the 2 groups (12.2 vs 13.4; P = 0.27). Mean lesion size in the B50 group decreased by 1.2 DA at both 1 and 2 years (primarily owing to resolution of hemorrhage) and increased in the Other group by 0.33 DA at 1 year and 0.91 DA at 2 years (P < 0.001). Leakage on FA and fluid on OCT were similar between groups at 1 and 2 years.In CATT, the B50 group had a visual prognosis similar to the Other group. Lesion size decreased markedly through 2 years. Eyes like those enrolled in CATT with neovascular AMD lesions composed of >50% blood can be managed similarly to those with less or no blood.Anti-vascular endothelial growth factor therapy for subfoveal choroidal neovascularization secondary to age-related macular degeneration: phase II study results.There is evidence to suggest that anti-vascular endothelial growth factor (anti-VEGF) therapy may be useful in treating ocular neovascularization. A phase IA single intravitreal injection study of anti-VEGF therapy for patients with subfoveal choroidal neovascularization (CNV) secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD) revealed a good safety profile. We performed a phase II multiple injection study of anti-VEGF therapy with and without photodynamic therapy for patients with subfoveal CNV secondary to AMD to determine the safety profile of multiple injection therapy.A phase II multiple-dose safety study.Twenty-one patients were treated with intravitreal injection with and without photodynamic therapy.Clinical evidence of toxicity and complications.No drug-related serious adverse events were revealed. Ophthalmic evaluation revealed that 87.5% of patients who received the anti-VEGF aptamer alone showed stabilized or improved vision 3 months after treatment and that 25% of eyes demonstrated a 3 line or greater improvement in vision on the Early Treatment of Diabetic Retinopathy Study chart during this period. A 60% 3 line gain at 3 months was noted in patients who received both the anti-VEGF aptamer and photodynamic therapy.Anti-VEGF therapy is a promising treatment for various forms of ocular neovascularization, including AMD. Multiple intravitreal injections of the anti-VEGF aptamer were well tolerated in this phase II study. Further clinical trials are necessary to demonstrate the efficacy and long-term safety of anti-VEGF therapy for AMD.Randomized study of bevacizumab vs ranibizumab for age-related macular degeneration: inappropriate conclusions.Intravitreal aflibercept injection for neovascular age-related macular degeneration: ninety-six-week results of the VIEW studies.To determine efficacy and safety of intravitreal aflibercept in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD) during a second year of variable dosing after a first-year fixed-dosing period.Two randomized, double-masked, active-controlled, phase 3 trials.Two thousand four hundred fifty-seven patients with neovascular AMD.From baseline to week 52, patients received 0.5 mg intravitreal ranibizumab every 4 weeks (Rq4), 2 mg aflibercept every 4 weeks (2q4), 0.5 mg aflibercept every 4 weeks (0.5q4), or 2 mg aflibercept every 8 weeks (2q8) after 3 monthly injections. During weeks 52 through 96, patients received their original dosing assignment using an as-needed regimen with defined retreatment criteria and mandatory dosing at least every 12 weeks.Proportion of eyes at week 96 that maintained best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA; lost <15 letters from baseline); change from baseline in BCVA.Proportions of eyes maintaining BCVA across treatments were 94.4% to 96.1% at week 52 and 91.5% to 92.4% at week 96. Mean BCVA gains were 8.3 to 9.3 letters at week 52 and 6.6 to 7.9 letters at week 96. Proportions of eyes without retinal fluid decreased from week 52 (60.3% to 72.4%) to week 96 (44.6% to 54.4%), and more 2q4 eyes were without fluid at weeks 52 and 96 than Rq4 eyes (difference of 10.4% [95% confidence interval {CI}, 4.9-15.9] and 9.0% [95% CI, 3.0-15.1]). Patients received on average 16.5, 16.0, 16.2, and 11.2 injections over 96 weeks and 4.7, 4.1, 4.6, and 4.2 injections during weeks 52 through 96 in the Rq4, 2q4, 0.5q4, and 2q8 groups, respectively. The number of injections during weeks 52 through 96 was lower in the 2q4 and 2q8 groups versus the Rq4 group (differences of -0.64 [95% CI, -0.89 to -0.40] and -0.55 [95% CI, -0.79 to -0.30]; P < 0.0001, post hoc analysis). Incidences of Antiplatelet Trialists' Collaboration-defined arterial thromboembolic events were similar across groups (2.4% to 3.8%) from baseline to week 96.All aflibercept and ranibizumab groups were equally effective in improving BCVA and preventing BCVA loss at 96 weeks. The 2q8 aflibercept group was similar to ranibizumab in visual acuity outcomes during 96 weeks, but with an average of 5 fewer injections. Small losses at 96 weeks in the visual and anatomic gains seen at 52 weeks in all arms were in the range of losses commonly observed with variable dosing.Ranibizumab for treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration: a phase I/II multicenter, controlled, multidose study.To assess safety of repeated intravitreal injections of ranibizumab in treating neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD), and to assess changes in visual acuity (VA) and AMD lesion characteristics.Multicenter, controlled, open-label, clinical trial.Sixty-four patients with subfoveal predominantly or minimally classic AMD-related choroidal neovascularization.In part 1, subjects were randomized to monthly intravitreal ranibizumab for 3 months (4 injections of 0.3 mg or 1 injection of 0.3 mg followed by 3 injections of 0.5 mg; n = 53) or usual care (UC; n = 11). In part 2, subjects could continue their regimen for 3 additional months or cross over to the alternative treatment.Adverse events (AEs), intraocular pressure (IOP), VA, and lesion characteristics assessed by fluorescein angiography and fundus photography.Of the 64 randomized subjects, 62 completed the 6-month study. Twenty of 25 subjects (80%) randomized to 0.3 mg, and 22 of 28 subjects (79%) randomized to 0.5-mg ranibizumab in part 1 continued on that treatment in part 2; 9 of 11 (82%) subjects randomized to UC in part 1 crossed over to ranibizumab treatment in part 2. The most common AEs with ranibizumab were reversible inflammation and minor injection-site hemorrhages. Serious AEs were iridocyclitis, endophthalmitis, and central retinal vein occlusion (1 subject each). Postinjection, IOP increased transiently in 22.6% of ranibizumab-treated eyes in parts 1 and 2. After 4 ranibizumab injections (day 98), mean (+/- standard deviation) VA had increased 9.4+/-13.3 and 9.1+/-17.2 letters in the 0.3- and 0.5-mg groups, respectively, but had decreased 5.1+/-9.6 letters with UC. In part 2 (day 210), VA increased from baseline 12.8+/-14.7 and 15.0+/-14.2 letters in subjects continuing on 0.3 and 0.5 mg, respectively. Visual acuity improved from baseline > or =15 letters in 26% (day 98) and 45% (day 210) of subjects initially randomized to and continuing on ranibizumab, respectively, and areas of leakage and subretinal fluid decreased. No UC subject had a > or =15-letter improvement at day 98.Repeated intravitreal injections of ranibizumab had a good safety profile and were associated with improved VA and decreased leakage from choroidal neovascularization in subjects with neovascular AMD.Verteporfin therapy and intravitreal bevacizumab combined and alone in choroidal neovascularization due to age-related macular degeneration.To evaluate the efficacy and safety of photodynamic therapy (PDT) with verteporfin combined with intravitreal bevacizumab in choroidal neovascularization (CNV) owing to age-related macular degeneration (AMD) in comparison with individual monotherapies used as controls.Randomized controlled pilot clinical trial.Males or females, aged > or =50 years, with minimally classic or occult CNV owing to AMD in at least 1 eye that had never been treated previously.One hundred sixty-five eyes in 165 subjects (53 males, 112 females) aged between 60 and 87 years (mean [standard deviation]: 75.7 [6.0] years) were randomly assigned to receive either a single PDT session with verteporfin (PDT group; n = 55), or a single administration of intravitreal bevacizumab (1.25 mg; BEV group; n = 55), or their combination (COMB group; n = 55). In the COMB group, bevacizumab was administered within 1 hour of PDT. Subjects were followed up at 1 and 3 months after treatment. Ophthalmic evaluations including optical coherence tomography, fluorescein angiography, and visual acuity (VA) and central foveal thickness (CFT) measurements were performed at each visit.Changes from baseline in best-corrected VA and CFT measured at 1- and 3-month follow-up visits.One hundred fifty-six subjects (54 BEV, 50 PDT, and 52 COMB) completed the study. At the 3-month follow-up, significant improvements in best-corrected VA were observed in the BEV and COMB groups (0.079 and 0.223 logarithm of the minimum angle of resolution [logMAR], respectively; P<0.0001 for both). In the PDT group, a slight worsening was noted. Significant reductions of CFT were observed in the 3 groups (-34.0 microm [BEV], -59.6 microm [COMB], and -50.5 microm [PDT]; P<0.0001 for all). At the 1-month follow-up, 46 subjects (16 BEV, 29 COMB, and 1 PDT) had an improvement >0.2 logMAR in best-corrected VA; at 3-month follow-up, this improvement persisted in 23 subjects (1 BEV, 22 COMB, and 0 PDT).Significant improvements in best-corrected VA after 1 month and their maintenance over a 3-month period were observed after verteporfin PDT combined with intravitreal bevacizumab. These results should be confirmed in larger and long-term prospective randomized trials.Re: Berg et al.: Comparison of ranibizumab and bevacizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration according to LUCAS treat-and-extend protocol (Ophthalmology 2015;122:146-52).Pegaptanib and age-related macular degeneration.A prospective study on different methods for the treatment of choroidal neovascularization. The efficacy of verteporfin photodynamic therapy, intravitreal bevacizumab and transpupillary thermotherapy in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration.The aim of this study was to compare the efficacy of verteporfin photodynamic therapy (PDT), intravitreal injections of bevacizumab (IVB) and transpupillary thermotherapy (TTT) in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).The study design was a prospective, interventional, comparative case series. Between December 2006 and March 2009, 426 eyes of 426 consecutive patients presenting with neovascular AMD were included into the study. Patients presented with subfoveal CNV predominantly classic, minimally classic, and occult with no classic component; lesion size less than 5000 µm in the greatest linear dimension, and the area of hemorrhages ≤1/3 were randomized to receive either PDT (group I) or IVB (group II) in a 1:1 ratio. Other patients with CNV were included into the group III and received TTT.One hundred eyes were treated with PDT. Mean baseline logMAR BCVA was 0.62 and final visual acuity decreased to 0.74 (p<0.05, Wilcoxon test); 104 eyes were treated with IVB. Mean baseline BCVA was 0.82 and final visual acuity increased to 0.79 (p>0.05, Wilcoxon test); 222 patients were treated with TTT. Mean baseline BCVA was 1.10 and final visual acuity decreased to 1.15 (p>0.05, Wilcoxon test). Among all eyes the average number of treatment sessions was 2.34 (SD 1.17).Our study shows that IVB injections had the best efficacy in the improvement of final BCVA. However, both IVB and TTT demonstrated good stabilization of vision. Although after PDT final BCVA was significantly worse from baseline, it may also be beneficial for some patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration.Incidence and Growth of Geographic Atrophy during 5 Years of Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials.To estimate the incidence, size, and growth rate of geographic atrophy (GA) during 5 years of follow-up among participants in the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials (CATT).Cohort within a clinical trial.Participants included in CATT.A total of 1185 CATT participants were randomly assigned to ranibizumab or bevacizumab treatment and to 3 treatment regimens. Participants were released from protocol treatment at 2 years and examined at approximately 5 years (N = 647). Two masked graders assessed the presence and size of GA in digital color photographs (CPs) and fluorescein angiograms (FAs) taken at baseline and years 1, 2, and 5. Cox proportional hazard models were used to identify risk factors for incidence of GA. Annual change in the square root of the total area of GA was the measure of growth. Multivariate linear mixed models including baseline demographic, treatment, and ocular characteristics on CP/FA and optical coherence tomography (OCT) as candidate risk factors were used to estimate adjusted growth rates, standard errors (SEs), and 95% confidence intervals (CIs).Geographic atrophy incidence and growth rate.Among the 1011 participants who did not have GA at baseline and had follow-up images gradable for GA, the cumulative incidence was 12% at 1 year, 17% at 2 years, and 38% at 5 years. At baseline, older age, hypercholesterolemia, worse visual acuity, larger choroidal neovascularization (CNV) area, retinal angiomatous proliferation (RAP) lesion, GA in the fellow eye, and intraretinal fluid were associated with a higher risk of incident GA. Thicker subretinal tissue complex and presence of subretinal fluid were associated with less GA development. The overall GA growth rate was 0.33 mm/year (SE, 0.02 mm/year). Eyes treated with ranibizumab in the first 2 years of the clinical trial had a higher growth rate than eyes treated with bevacizumab (adjusted growth rate, 0.38 vs. 0.28 mm/year; P = 0.009). Geographic atrophy in the fellow eye, hemorrhage, and absence of sub-retinal pigment epithelium fluid at baseline were associated with a higher growth rate.Development of GA is common 5 years after initiating therapy. Several risk factors identified at 2 years of follow-up persist at 5 years of follow-up.Outcomes following three-line vision loss during treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration: subgroup analyses from MARINA and ANCHOR.This study aims to assess the impact of continued ranibizumab treatment for neovascular age-related macular degeneration on patients from the MARINA and ANCHOR randomised clinical studies who lost ≥ 3 lines of best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA) at any time during the first year of treatment.Baseline characteristics, mean BCVA over time and ocular adverse events (AEs) were evaluated both for patients whose BCVA loss occurred at any post-baseline visit and for patients whose BCVA loss was acute. The visit when the ≥ 3-line BCVA loss was detected was defined as the new baseline.Continued monthly ranibizumab treatment led to an improvement in mean BCVA from the new baseline. On average, patients with acute BCVA loss gained 11.9 letters at 3 months after the new baseline, compared with 0.3 letters gained with sham. No strong signals were detected in patient demographics and baseline characteristics for prognostic markers of BCVA loss. Furthermore, there was no pattern in the AE profile of patients with acute BCVA loss to suggest that BCVA recovery could be attributed to spontaneously resolving AEs.Continued ranibizumab treatment appears to be beneficial for patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration who experience a ≥ 3-line BCVA loss during the first year of treatment.Ranibizumab treatment outcomes in phakic versus pseudophakic eyes: an individual patient data analysis of 2 phase 3 trials.To compare visual outcomes in phakic and pseudophakic eyes treated with monthly intravitreal ranibizumab for exudative age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Meta-analysis of individual patient data from 2 phase 3 clinical trials of intravitreal ranibizumab in neovascular AMD (Anti-VEGF Antibody for the Treatment of Predominantly Classic Choroidal Neovascularization in Age-Related Macular Degeneration [ANCHOR], ClinicalTrials.gov number, NCT00061594; and Minimally Classic/Occult Trial of the Anti-VEGF Antibody Ranibizumab in the Treatment of Neovascular Age-Related Macular Degeneration [MARINA], ClinicalTrials.gov number NCT00056836).A total of 1137 patients from 2 phase 3 clinical trials.Phakic and pseudophakic eyes were treated with monthly intravitreal ranibizumab (0.3 mg or 0.5 mg), sham injections plus verteporfin photodynamic therapy (ANCHOR), or sham injections alone (MARINA).Mean change from baseline in Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study (ETDRS) visual acuity (VA) and the proportion of patients gaining or losing 15 or more ETDRS letters.After adjusting for baseline covariates, no differences were seen in mean change in VA for phakic versus pseudophakic eyes. Pseudophakic eyes were more likely to lose 15 or more letters of vision than phakic eyes at 12 months, but not at 24 months.Overall, in this analysis, lens status did not demonstrate an independent influence on mean VA for eyes treated with monthly ranibizumab. It is possible that phakic eyes may be less prone to severe vision loss.Proprietary or commercial disclosure may be found after the references.Ranibizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration.Ranibizumab--a recombinant, humanized, monoclonal antibody Fab that neutralizes all active forms of vascular endothelial growth factor A--has been evaluated for the treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration.In this multicenter, 2-year, double-blind, sham-controlled study, we randomly assigned patients with age-related macular degeneration with either minimally classic or occult (with no classic lesions) choroidal neovascularization to receive 24 monthly intravitreal injections of ranibizumab (either 0.3 mg or 0.5 mg) or sham injections. The primary end point was the proportion of patients losing fewer than 15 letters from baseline visual acuity at 12 months.We enrolled 716 patients in the study. At 12 months, 94.5% of the group given 0.3 mg of ranibizumab and 94.6% of those given 0.5 mg lost fewer than 15 letters, as compared with 62.2% of patients receiving sham injections (P<0.001 for both comparisons). Visual acuity improved by 15 or more letters in 24.8% of the 0.3-mg group and 33.8% of the 0.5-mg group, as compared with 5.0% of the sham-injection group (P<0.001 for both doses). Mean increases in visual acuity were 6.5 letters in the 0.3-mg group and 7.2 letters in the 0.5-mg group, as compared with a decrease of 10.4 letters in the sham-injection group (P<0.001 for both comparisons). The benefit in visual acuity was maintained at 24 months. During 24 months, presumed endophthalmitis was identified in five patients (1.0%) and serious uveitis in six patients (1.3%) given ranibizumab.Intravitreal administration of ranibizumab for 2 years prevented vision loss and improved mean visual acuity, with low rates of serious adverse events, in patients with minimally classic or occult (with no classic lesions) choroidal neovascularization secondary to age-related macular degeneration. (ClinicalTrials.gov number, NCT00056836 [ClinicalTrials.gov].).Cost-effectiveness of ranibizumab compared with photodynamic treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration.This study compared the cost-effectiveness of ranibizumab with that of photodynamic therapy (PDT) in the treatment of predominantly classic choroidal neovascularization secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD) from the perspective of a third-party payer in a Spanish setting.We constructed a Markov model with 5 states defined by visual acuity (VA) in the better-seeing eye (Snellen scale), as follows: VA >20/40, <or=20/40 to >20/80, </or20/80 to >20/200, <or=20/200 to >20/400, and <or=20/400. A death state was also included. We took transition probabilities, number of ranibizumab injections, and number of PDT treatments from the ANCHOR (Anti-Vascular Endothelial Growth Factor Antibody for the Treatment of Predominantly Classic Choroidal Neovascularization in Age-Related Macular Degeneration) trial. Utilities were taken from a published study of patients' preferences. We used unit costs from our hospital and drug costs from a national database. Resource utilization was determined by an ophthalmologist according to current clinical practice. We performed univariate, threshold, and probabilistic sensitivity analyses. Incremental costs (2007 euro) and quality-adjusted life-years (QALYs), both discounted at a 3% annual rate, and incremental cost-effectiveness ratios (ICERs; euro/QALY) were determined for the 2-year and life-expectancy time horizons.Treating patients with varying degrees of visual impairment with ranibizumab instead of PDT, with a 2-year time horizon, was found to be euro18,328 more costly and to confer 0.140 additional QALY (euro131,275/QALY). This ICER was reduced to euro39,398/ QALY for the longer life-expectancy time horizon. According to the probabilistic sensitivity analysis, PDT is the therapy of choice in all cases below the threshold of euro30,000/QALY for the 2-year time horizon. Ranibizumab was the optimal intervention in 26% of cases in the longer lifetime horizon. When the initial VA was <or=20/400, the ICER increased to euro255,477 over 2 years. When ranibizumab was administered on an as-needed basis, as in the PrONTO (Prospective Optical coherence tomography imaging of patients with Neovascular AMD Treated with intra-Ocular ranibizumab) trial, the ICERs were reduced to euro29,566/QALY and euro11,469/QALY in the 2-year and life-expectancy horizons, respectively.Based on these results, ranibizumab was not cost-effective when administered on a monthly basis. When administered as needed, ranibizumab was cost-effective compared with PDT for the treatment of AMD.Photographic assessment of baseline fundus morphologic features in the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials.To describe the methods used for assessment of baseline fundus characteristics from color photography and fluorescein angiography (FA) in the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials (CATT) and to describe the relationship between these characteristics and visual acuity.Randomized, masked, multicenter trial.This investigation included 1185 participants of the CATT study.Baseline stereoscopic color fundus photographs and FAs of participants in the CATT study were assessed at a central fundus photograph reading center by masked readers. Replicate assessments of random samples of photographs were performed to assess intragrader and intergrader agreements. The association of the lesion characteristics with baseline visual acuity was assessed using analyses of variance and correlation coefficients.Intragrader and intergrader reproducibility, visual acuity, and lesion characteristics.Intragrader and intergrader reproducibility showed agreements ranging from 75% to 100% and weighted κ values ranging from 0.48 to 1.0 for qualitative determinations. The intraclass correlation coefficients were 0.96 to 0.97 for quantitative measurements of choroidal neovascularization (CNV) area and total area of CNV lesion. The mean visual acuity varied by the type of pathologic features in the foveal center: 64.5 letters (standard error, 0.7 letters) for fluid only, 59.0 letters (standard error, 0.5 letters) for CNV, and 58.7 letters (standard error, 1.3 letters) for hemorrhage (P<0.001). Fibrotic or atrophic scar present in the lesion, but not under the center of the fovea, also was associated with a markedly reduced visual acuity of 48.4 letters (standard error, 2.2 letters; P<0.0001). Although total area of CNV lesion was correlated weakly with visual acuity when all participants were assessed (Spearman correlation coefficient, ρ = -0.16; P<0.001), the correlation was stronger within patients with predominantly classic lesions (ρ = -0.42; P<0.001).These results show that the methodology used for grading CATT fundus images has good reproducibility. As expected, larger total CNV lesion area and pathologic findings such as hemorrhage, fibrosis, and atrophy at baseline are associated with decreased visual acuity.Differences of frequency in administration of ranibizumab and bevacizumab in patients with neovascular AMD.Intravitreal ranibizumab or bevacizumab are the most used drugs for treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration (nAMD). Repeated intravitreal injections represent an economic burden and may be associated with serious complications. The aim of this study is to evaluate the number of needed injections within 1 year of treatment.55 patients over 50 years of age with nAMD and visual acuity (VA) between 20/40 and 20/320 were included. Scheduled visits and treatment were performed monthly for 1 year. After a loading dose of three intravitreal injections (either ranibizumab = group 1 or bevacizumab = group 2), an "as needed" regimen was performed. Primary endpoint was a difference in the injection frequencies of ranibizumab and bevacizumab. Secondary endpoints were best corrected visual acuity (BCVA) and central retinal thickness (CRT).Difference in number of injections was not significant (5.00 ± 1.67 (ranibizumab group) vs. 5.80 ± 2.28 (bevacizumab group), p = 0.084). Mean BCVA was 59.12 ± 16.64 letters after 12 months if patients received ranibizumab (p = 0.001) and 64.75 ± 17.03 letters if patients received bevacizumab (p = 0.037). There was no statistical significance between the two groups (p = 0.631). The mean CRT did not differ significantly between groups after 12 months (315.67 ± 65.86 µm for ranibizumab, 350.47 ± 102.84 µm for bevacizumab, p = 0.088).There was no difference in number of treatment, BCVA and CRT after 1 year between ranibizumab and bevacizumab in patients with nAMD.Treating early choroidal neovascularisation with pegaptanib sodium in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration: findings of the PERSPECTIVES study.Risk of scar in the comparison of age-related macular degeneration treatments trials.To describe risk factors for scar in eyes treated with ranibizumab or bevacizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Prospective cohort study within a randomized clinical trial.Patients with no scar on color fundus photography (CFP) or fluorescein angiography (FA) at enrollment in the Comparison of Age-related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials (CATT).Eyes were assigned to ranibizumab or bevacizumab treatment and to 1 of 3 dosing regimens for 2 years. Masked readers assessed CFP and FA. Baseline demographic characteristics, visual acuity, morphologic features on photography and optical coherence tomography (OCT), and genotypes associated with AMD risk were evaluated as risk factors using adjusted hazard ratios (aHRs) and associated 95% confidence intervals (CIs). Scars were classified as fibrotic with well-demarcated elevated mounds of yellowish white tissue or nonfibrotic with discrete flat areas of hyperpigmentation with varying amounts of central depigmentation.Scar formation.Scar developed in 480 of 1059 eyes (45.3%) by 2 years. Baseline characteristics associated with greater risk of scarring were predominantly classic choroidal neovascularization (CNV) (aHR, 3.1; CI, 2.4-3.9) versus occult CNV, blocked fluorescence (aHR, 1.4; CI, 1.1-1.8), foveal retinal thickness >212 μm (aHR, 2.4; CI, 1.7-3.6) versus <120 μm, foveal subretinal tissue complex thickness >275 μm (aHR, 2.4; CI, 1.7-3.6) versus ≤75 μm, foveal subretinal fluid (aHR, 1.5; CI, 1.1-2.0) versus no subretinal fluid, and subretinal hyperreflective material (SHRM) (aHR, 1.7; CI, 1.3-2.3) versus no SHRM. Eyes with elevation of the retinal pigment epithelium had lower risk (aHR, 0.6; CI, 0.5-0.8) versus no elevation. Drug, dosing regimen, and genotype had no statistically significant association with scarring. Fibrotic scars developed in 24.7% of eyes, and nonfibrotic scars developed in 20.6% of eyes. Baseline risk factors for the scar types were similar except that eyes with larger lesion size or visual acuity <20/40 were more likely to develop fibrotic scars.Approximately half of eyes enrolled in CATT developed scar by 2 years. Eyes with classic neovascularization, a thicker retina, and more fluid or material under the foveal center of the retina are more likely to develop scar.Subgroup analysis of the MARINA study of ranibizumab in neovascular age-related macular degeneration.An examination of clinically relevant subgroups of patients in the MARINA study of ranibizumab in treatment of minimally classic or occult with no classic choroidal neovascularization (CNV) secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD) was done. Objectives were to determine the effectiveness of ranibizumab across subgroups, compare the effectiveness of ranibizumab with that of sham injection within subgroups, and evaluate the relationship between selected baseline characteristics and visual acuity (VA) outcomes.Retrospective subgroup analyses of 24-month data from the MARINA study.Seven hundred sixteen patients were randomly assigned to 0.3 mg ranibizumab (n = 238), 0.5 mg ranibizumab (n = 240), or sham treatment (n = 238).Efficacy outcomes were compared across subgroups based on patients' gender, age, baseline VA score, baseline CNV lesion size, CNV lesion type, and duration of neovascular AMD using univariate analyses. Multivariate analyses were performed on the change from baseline to 24 months in VA score to assess further the correlation between baseline characteristics and VA outcome.Proportion of patients losing <15 letters from baseline, proportion gaining > or =15 letters from baseline, and mean VA score change from baseline.For each of the 3 VA end points, all subgroups of ranibizumab-treated patients did better on average than the sham-treated patients. Increasing age, larger CNV lesion size at baseline, and a higher baseline VA score were all associated with greater loss of letters in the sham group or less gain of letters in the ranibizumab groups. However, the net benefit of ranibizumab versus sham treatment was greater in patients who scored higher than in those who scored lower in baseline VA.This subgroup analysis of 24-month data from the MARINA study indicates that ranibizumab treatment was associated with an average increase from baseline VA in all subgroups evaluated, and that ranibizumab treatment was superior to sham treatment across all subgroups. The most important predictors of VA outcomes were, in decreasing order of importance, baseline VA score, CNV lesion size, and age.Ranibizumab for predominantly classic neovascular age-related macular degeneration: subgroup analysis of first-year ANCHOR results.Subgroup data from a pivotal phase 3 study comparing ranibizumab (LUCENTIS) with verteporfin (VISUDYNE) photodynamic therapy (PDT) in patients with predominantly classic choroidal neovascularization (CNV) secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD) were retrospectively analyzed to identify patient and disease characteristics that may predict visual acuity (VA) treatment outcomes.Retrospective subgroup analysis of 12-month data from the ANCHOR study.Univariate analyses were performed to assess VA outcomes across subgroups based on patients' gender and baseline age, VA score, CNV lesion size, CNV lesion type, and duration of neovascular AMD, followed by multivariate analyses to identify predictors of the VA score change from baseline at 12 months. main outcome measures: Proportion of patients losing <15 letters and proportion gaining > or =15 letters from baseline VA; mean change from baseline VA.On average, all subgroups of ranibizumab-treated patients did better than PDT patients for all three VA outcome measures. In the multivariate analysis, lower baseline VA score, smaller baseline CNV lesion size, and younger baseline age were associated with greater gain of letters with ranibizumab treatment and less loss of letters with PDT.Subgroup analysis of 12-month data from the ANCHOR study showed ranibizumab to be superior to PDT in all subgroups evaluated, and was consistent with the subgroup analysis of 24-month data from the other pivotal phase 3 study of ranibizumab (MARINA) in showing that the most important predictors of VA outcomes were, in decreasing order of impact, the patient's baseline VA score, CNV lesion size, and age.Driving ability reported by neovascular age-related macular degeneration patients after treatment with ranibizumab.To determine the impact of ranibizumab on driving status, driving ability perception, and having 20/40 vision or better in patients with choroidal neovascularization resulting from age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Phase III, multicenter, randomized clinical trials (Minimally Classic/Occult Trial of the Anti-VEGF Antibody Ranibizumab in the Treatment of Neovascular Age-Related Macular Degeneration [MARINA] and Anti-VEGF Antibody for the Treatment of Predominantly Classic Choroidal Neovascularization in Age-Related Macular Degeneration [ANCHOR]).One thousand one hundred twenty-six patients with choroidal neovascularization resulting from AMD.Participants were assigned randomly to sham (n=238), 0.3-mg ranibizumab monthly injections (n=238), or 0.5-mg ranibizumab monthly injections (n=240) for 24 months (MARINA), or were randomized to verteporfin photodynamic therapy (PDT; n=143), 0.3-mg ranibizumab monthly injections (n=140), or 0.5-mg ranibizumab monthly injections (n=140) for 24 months (ANCHOR).Self-reported driving status and driving ability perception were assessed as exploratory outcomes at baseline through 24 months after baseline using the 25-item National Eye Institute Visual Function Questionnaire. Best-corrected visual acuity in each eye was assessed monthly through 24 months.At baseline, 68.6% of patients in the MARINA trial and 62.7% of patients in the ANCHOR trial reported driving. Among patients driving at baseline in the MARINA trial 2 years after randomization, 67.2% (95% confidence interval [CI], 59.2-75.2) of sham patients and 78.4% (95% CI, 71.8-85.0) of 0.5-mg patients reported that they were still driving. Among patients driving at baseline in the ANCHOR trial at 2 years after randomization, 71.6% (95% CI, 60.8-82.4) of PDT patients and 91.4% (95% CI, 85.3-97.5) of 0.5-mg patients were still driving. Also in the ANCHOR trial, ranibizumab-treated patients who were not driving at baseline seemed more likely to drive by months 12 and 24 than PDT patients. Perception of driving ability was correlated with improvement in visual acuity (VA) in the better-seeing eye at 12 and 24 months (R2=0.17 and R2=0.20 at 12 and 24 months, respectively [P<0.001], in the MARINA trial; R2=0.13 and R2=0.14, respectively [P<0.001], in the ANCHOR trial). Visual acuity in one or both eyes 2 years after randomization was more likely to be 20/40 or better in the ranibizumab-treated groups.These results suggest that patients with neovascular AMD treated with ranibizumab are more likely to report driving ability and have vision of at least 20/40 than patients given sham treatment or PDT.Proprietary or commercial disclosure may be found after the references.Outcomes in Eyes with Retinal Angiomatous Proliferation in the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials (CATT).To compare baseline characteristics, visual acuity (VA), and morphologic outcomes between eyes with retinal angiomatous proliferation (RAP) and all other eyes among patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (NVAMD) treated with anti-vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) drugs.Prospective cohort study within the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials (CATT).Patients with NVAMD.Reading center staff evaluated digital color fundus photographs, fluorescein angiography (FA) images, and optical coherence tomography (OCT) scans of eyes with NVAMD treated with either ranibizumab or bevacizumab over a 2-year period. Retinal angiomatous proliferation was identified by the intense intra-retinal leakage of fluorescein in combination with other associated features.Visual acuity; fluorescein leakage; scar; geographic atrophy (GA) on FA; retinal thickness, fluid, and subretinal hyperreflective material (SHRM) on OCT; and the number of intravitreal anti-VEGF injections at 1 and 2 years.Retinal angiomatous proliferation was present in 126 of 1183 (10.7%) study eyes at baseline. Mean VA improvement from baseline was greater (10.6 vs. 6.9 letters; P = 0.01) at 1 year, but similar at 2 years (7.8 vs. 6.2 letters; P = 0.34). At 1 year, eyes with RAP were more likely to have no fluid (46% vs. 26%; P < 0.001) on OCT, no leakage on FA (61% vs. 50%; P = 0.03), and greater reduction in foveal thickness (-240 μm vs. -161 μm; P < 0.001). They were more likely to demonstrate GA (24% vs. 15%; P = 0.01) and less likely to have scarring (17% vs. 36%; P < 0.001) or SHRM (36% vs. 48%; P = 0.01). These results were similar at 2 years. The mean change in lesion size at 1 year differed (-0.27 DA vs. 0.27 DA; P = 0.02), but was similar at 2 years (0.49 DA vs. 0.79 DA; P = 0.26). Among eyes treated PRN, eyes with RAP received a lower mean number of injections in year 1 (6.1 vs. 7.4; P = 0.003) and year 2 (5.4 vs. 6.6; P = 0.025).At both 1 and 2 years after initiation of anti-VEGF treatment in CATT, eyes with RAP were less likely to have fluid, FA leakage, scar, and SHRM and more likely to have GA than eyes without RAP. Mean improvement in VA was similar at 2 years.Bevacizumab vs ranibizumab for age-related macular degeneration: early results of a prospective double-masked, randomized clinical trial.Intravitreal bevacizumab (Avastin) therapy versus photodynamic therapy plus intravitreal triamcinolone for neovascular age-related macular degeneration: 6-month results of a prospective, randomised, controlled clinical study.To compare functional and anatomical outcomes of intravitreal bevacizumab (Avastin) and verteporfin (photodynamic) therapy (PDT) combined with intravitreal triamcinolone (IVTA) in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Twenty-eight patients with neovascular AMD were enrolled in a prospective, randomised, controlled clinical trial. All patients randomly assigned to 1 mg intravitreal bevacizumab (0.04 ml) received three initial treatments at 4-week intervals. In further follow-up retreatment was based on optical coherence tomography (OCT). Patients randomly assigned to standard PDT received a same-day intravitreal injection of 4 mg triamcinolone (Kenalog). Retreatment was based on fluorescein angiography at 3-month intervals. Functional and anatomical results were evaluated using the Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study protocol vision charts, fluorescein angiography and OCT.In the bevacizumab-treated group mean visual acuity (VA) improved to a 2.2 line gain at 6 months follow-up. Eyes treated in the PDT plus IVTA group had a stable mean VA at month 6 compared with baseline. There was a statistically significant difference (p = 0.03, analysis of variance (ANOVA)) between both groups as early as one day after initial treatment. The reduction in central retinal thickness (CRT) showed no significant difference between both groups (p = 0.3, ANOVA). Mean CRT was reduced from 357 microm at baseline to 239 microm at month 6 in bevacizumab-treated patients and from 326 microm to 222 microm, respectively, in PDT plus IVTA-treated patients. No significant local or systemic safety concerns were detected up to month 6.Intravitreal bevacizumab showed promising 6-month results in patients with neovascular AMD. Functional outcomes appear not only to be dependent on a reduction in CRT but also on the treatment modality used.Macular Morphology and Visual Acuity in the Second Year of the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials.To describe the association between morphologic features on fundus photography (FP), fluorescein angiography (FA), and optical coherence tomography (OCT) and visual acuity (VA) in the second year of the Comparison of Age-related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials (CATT).Prospective cohort study within a randomized clinical trial.Participants in the CATT.Study eye eligibility required angiographic and OCT evidence of choroidal neovascularization (CNV) secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD) and VA between 20/25 and 20/320. Treatment was assigned randomly to ranibizumab or bevacizumab with 3 different dosing regimens over a 2-year period.Fluid type, location, and thickness; retina and subretinal tissue complex thickness on OCT; size and lesion composition on FP and FA; and VA.Among 1185 CATT participants, 993 (84%) had fluid on OCT at baseline and completed 2 years of follow-up. At 2 years, intraretinal fluid (IRF), subretinal fluid (SRF), sub-retinal pigment epithelium (RPE) fluid, and subretinal tissue complex thickness decreased in all treatment groups. Ranibizumab monthly was best able to resolve each type of fluid. Eyes with SRF in the foveal center on OCT had better mean VA than eyes with no SRF (72.8 vs. 66.6 letters; P = 0.006). Eyes with IRF in the foveal center had worse mean VA than eyes without IRF (59.9 vs. 70.9 letters; P < 0.0001). Eyes with retinal thickness <120 μm had worse VA compared with eyes with retinal thickness 120 to 212 and >212 μm (59.4 vs. 71.3 vs. 70.3 letters; P < 0.0001). At 2 years, the mean VA (letters) of eyes varied substantially by the type of subfoveal pathology on FP and FA: 70.6 for no pathology; 74.1 for fluid only; 73.3 for CNV or pigment epithelial (RPE) detachment; 68.4 for nongeographic atrophy; and 62.9 for geographic atrophy, hemorrhage, RPE tear, or scar (P < 0.0001).The associations between VA and morphologic features identified through year 1 were maintained or strengthened during year 2. Eyes with foveal IRF, abnormally thin retina, greater thickness of the subretinal tissue complex on OCT, and subfoveal geographic atrophy or scar on FP/FA had the worst VA. Subretinal fluid was associated with better VA.Predictors of visual response to intravitreal bevacizumab for treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration.Purpose. To identify the predictors of visual response to the bevacizumab treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD). Design. A cohort study within the Neovascular AMD Treatment Trial Using Bevacizumab (NATTB). Methods. This was a multicenter trial including 144 participants from the NATTB study. Visual outcomes measured by change in visual acuity (VA) score, proportion gaining ≥15 letters, and change in central retinal thickness (CRT) were compared among groups according to the baseline, demographic, and ocular characteristics and genotypes. Results. Mean change in the VA score was 9.2 ± 2.3 SD letters with a total of 46 participants (31.9%) gaining ≥15 letters. Change in median CRT was -81.5 μ m. Younger age, lower baseline VA score, shorter duration of neovascular AMD, and TT genotype in rs10490924 were significantly associated with greater VA score improvement (P = 0.028, P < 0.001, P = 0.02, and P = 0.039, resp.). Lower baseline VA score and TT genotype in rs10490924 were significantly associated with a higher likelihood of gaining ≥15 letters (P = 0.028, and P = 0.021, resp.). Conclusions. Baseline VA and genotype of rs10490924 were both important predictors for visual response to bevacizumab at 6 months. This trial is registered with the Registration no. NCT01306591. Bevacizumab vs ranibizumab for age-related macular degeneration: 1-year outcomes of a prospective, double-masked randomised clinical trial.To report 1-year visual and anatomic outcomes of a prospective, double-masked randomised clinical trial comparing bevacizumab with ranibizumab for the treatment of age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Patients who met inclusion criteria were randomised 2 : 1 to bevacizumab or ranibizumab. All subjects and investigators (except for the pharmacist responsible for study assignments) were masked to treatment arms. Visual acuity was taken on Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study chart. Patients were given either bevacizumab or ranibizumab every month for the first 3 months, followed by an optical coherence tomography-guided, variable-dosing treatment schedule. Main outcomes measured included visual acuity, foveal thickness, and total number of injections over the 1-year treatment period.In total, 15 patients received bevacizumab and 7 patients received ranibizumab. The average pre-operative visual acuity was 34.9 letters in the bevacizumab group, and 32.7 letters in the ranibizumab group. At 1-year follow-up, mean vision was 42.5 letters in the bevacizumab group, and 39.0 letters in the ranibizumab group. Two-tailed t-test failed to showed statistical significance between the two groups (P=0.5). Patients in the bevacizumab group underwent an average of eight injections, whereas patients in the ranibizumab group underwent a mean of four injections (P=0.001).The 1-year outcomes of a prospective, double-masked, randomised clinical trial comparing bevacizumab with ranibizumab failed to show a difference in visual and anatomic outcomes between the two treatments for choroidal neovascularisation in AMD. Total injections given over the treatment period were significantly different between the two groups. Further studies with larger sample sizes are warranted.Ranibizumab combined with verteporfin photodynamic therapy in neovascular age-related macular degeneration (FOCUS): year 2 results.To assess the efficacy and adverse-events profile of combined treatment with ranibizumab and verteporfin photodynamic therapy (PDT) in patients with predominantly classic choroidal neovascularization (CNV) secondary to neovascular age-related macular degeneration.Two-year, multicenter, randomized, single-masked, controlled study.Patients received monthly intravitreal injections of ranibizumab 0.5 mg (n = 106) or sham injections (n = 56). All patients received PDT on day zero, then quarterly as needed. Efficacy assessment included changes in visual acuity (VA) and lesion characteristics and PDT frequency. Adverse events were summarized by incidence and severity.At month 24, 88% of ranibizumab + PDT patients had lost <15 letters from baseline VA (vs 75% for PDT alone), 25% had gained >or=15 letters (vs 7% for PDT alone), and the two treatment arms differed by 12.4 letters in mean VA change (P < .05 for all between-group differences). The VA benefit of adding ranibizumab to PDT in year one persisted through year two. On average, ranibizumab + PDT patients exhibited less lesion growth and greater reduction of CNV leakage and subretinal fluid accumulation, and required fewer PDT retreatments, than PDT-alone patients (mean = 0.4 vs 3.0 PDT retreatments). Endophthalmitis and serious intraocular inflammation occurred, respectively, in 2.9% and 12.4% of ranibizumab + PDT patients and 0% of PDT-alone patients. Incidences of serious nonocular adverse events were similar in the two treatment groups.Through two years, ranibizumab + PDT was more effective than PDT alone and had a low rate of associated adverse events.Ranibizumab treatment administered as needed for occult and minimally classic neovascular membranes in age-related macular degeneration.To report the clinical experience of intravitreal ranibizumab administered as needed for the treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).We retrospectively reviewed the charts of 41 patients (41 eyes) with occult and minimally classic neovascular membrane in AMD. Patients received intravitreal injections (0.5 mg) of ranibizumab and were monitored monthly for 12 months. Forty-one eyes were retreated at the discretion of the treating physician on an as-needed basis after the first injection, instead of initially giving three monthly injections. The main outcomes measured were change in mean visual acuity and central retinal thickness, and the total number of injections received by patients during the 12 months.At 12 months, the mean logarithm of the minimum angle of resolution (logMAR) visual acuity improved by 0.078 logMAR units (P = 0.046) and the mean central retinal thickness decreased by 85.7 μm (P < 0.001). Thirty of 41 eyes (73.2%) avoided any loss of vision, and 20 eyes (48.8 %) showed improved visual acuity. A mean of 4.07 injections were given over the 12 months.Ranibizumab administered on an as-needed basis may stabilize visual acuity in patients with neovascular AMD.Plasma levels of vascular endothelial growth factor before and after intravitreal injection of bevacizumab, ranibizumab and pegaptanib in patients with age-related macular degeneration, and in patients with diabetic macular oedema.To determine the level of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) in the plasma of patients with diabetic macular edema (DME) and of patients with exudative age-related macular degeneration (ARMD) before and after intravitreal injection of bevacizumab, ranibizumab or pegaptanib.30 patients with DME and 30 patients with ARMD were included in this randomized controlled study. Patients were randomized to treatment with ranibizumab (0.5 mg), bevacizumab (1.25 mg) or pegaptanib (0.3 mg). 10 patients with DME received bevacizumab, 10 ranibizumab and 10 pegaptanib. The same randomized treatment allocation applied to the 30 patients with ARMD. The concentrations of VEGF were measured by ELISA just before the injection, after 7 days and 1 month.Plasma VEGF in patients with exudative ARMD before the injection of bevacizumab was 89.7 pg/ml. It was significantly reduced to 25.1 pg/ml after 7 days (p=0.01), and to 22.8 pg/ml after 1 month (p=0.008). In patients with DME the same systemic reduction by bevacizumab was observed with a significant decrease of baseline VEGF level from 72.2 pg/ml to 13.7 pg/ml after 7 days (p=0.008) and 17.1 pg/ml at 4 weeks with (p=0.012). No significant reductions of plasma VEGF levels were observed in patients receiving ranibizumab or pegaptanib during follow-up.Bevacizumab significantly reduces the level of VEGF in the blood plasma for up to one month in patients with DME as well as in those with ARMD. No significant systemic effects of intravitreal ranibizumab or pegaptanib on plasma VEGF could be observed.Computerized model of cost-utility analysis for treatment of age-related macular degeneration.To present a computerized model assessing individualized cost utility for current treatments for neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD) to enhance discussion regarding treatment options.Case- and eye-specific cost-utility analysis using individual case scenarios.Visual acuity data from published randomized controlled trials are incorporated into this analysis.Computerized model (Microsoft Visual Basic 6.0 programming) to establish preference-based cost-utility analysis in association with individual cost of treatment and blindness for neovascular AMD for both the better and worst seeing eye, with extrapolation of results over a 5-year term.Cost per quality-adjusted life-year (QALY) and cost per QALY gained for comparison of treatments for specific visual acuities.All treatments show an increase in utility in comparison with best supportive care (BSC) if the better-seeing eye is treated. Ranibizumab, using the Phase IIIb, Multicenter, Randomized, Double-Masked, Sham Injection-Controlled Study of the Efficacy and Safety of Ranibizumab in Subjects with Subfoveal Choroidal Neovascularisation (CNV) with or without Classic CNV Secondary to AMD (PIER) regimen, is the most cost effective at $626 938 per QALY gained for treatment of the better seeing eye. To increase utility value when treating the worst seeing eye, the vision must improve to such a degree that it becomes the better seeing eye. This level of improvement is only possible if there is <9 letters difference between the 2 eyes and treated with ranibizumab. Over 5 years, increasing influence from the cost of blindness results in increasing costs for those treatments unable to stabilize vision. Within 5 years, the cost per QALY for the BSC is greater than all treatments except monthly ranibizumab injections.Assessment of cost of treatment incorporates both effectiveness of treatment, cost of treatment, and cost of blindness. Cost analysis enables incorporation of these aspects of treatment with the quality of life data to provide a better comparison of treatments over time. This analysis has provided a method for individual analysis and therefore can provide the structure for resource allocation.The authors have no proprietary or commercial interest in any materials discussed in this article.Visual outcomes and growth factor changes of two dosages of intravitreal bevacizumab for neovascular age-related macular degeneration: a randomized, controlled trial.To evaluate the visual and growth factor changes of two different intravitreal bevacizumab dosages for neovascular age-related macular degeneration.Fifty eyes of 50 patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration were randomized to receive 3 monthly intravitreal injections of 1.25 mg (24 eyes) or 2.5 mg (26 eyes) bevacizumab. Patients were observed for 6 months, and the logarithm of minimal angle of resolution best-corrected visual acuity, central foveal thickness, aqueous vascular endothelial growth factor, and pigment epithelial derived factor levels were assessed.Both groups had significant central foveal thickness reductions at 6 months (P < 0.001). Six (23.1%) eyes in the 2.5-mg group lost 3 or more lines compared with none in the 1.25-mg group (P = 0.023). No significant difference in logarithm of minimal angle of resolution best-corrected visual acuity, central foveal thickness, or growth factors levels was found between the two groups at all visits. Eyes with persistent angiographic leakage at 3 months had significantly higher baseline aqueous vascular endothelial growth factor levels compared with eyes without leakage (P = 0.013). Logistic regression analysis showed that high baseline aqueous vascular endothelial growth factor level was the only significant factor associated with persistent leakage at 3 months (P = 0.040).Three monthly intravitreal 1.25-mg bevacizumab injections seemed to result in better visual outcome than 2.5 mg bevacizumab. Baseline aqueous vascular endothelial growth factor level might have a role in predicting angiographic response after bevacizumab injections.A randomised controlled trial to assess the clinical effectiveness and cost-effectiveness of alternative treatments to Inhibit VEGF in Age-related choroidal Neovascularisation (IVAN).Bevacizumab (Avastin®, Roche), which is used in cancer therapy, is the 'parent' molecule from which ranibizumab (Lucentis®, Novartis) was derived for the treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration (nAMD). There were reports in the literature on the effectiveness of bevacizumab in treating nAMD, but no trials. The cost per dose of bevacizumab is about 5-10% that of ranibizumab. This trial was a head-to-head comparison of these two drugs.To compare the clinical effectiveness and cost-effectiveness of ranibizumab and bevacizumab, and two treatment regimens, for nAMD.Multicentre, factorial randomised controlled trial with within-trial cost-utility and cost-minimisation analyses from the perspective of the UK NHS. Participants, health professionals and researchers were masked to allocation of drug but not regimen. Computer-generated random allocations to combinations of ranibizumab or bevacizumab, and continuous or discontinuous regimen, were stratified by centre, blocked and concealed.Twenty-three ophthalmology departments in NHS hospitals.Patients ≥ 50 years old with active nAMD in the study eye with best corrected distance visual acuity (BCVA) ≥ 25 letters measured on a Early Treatment of Diabetic Retinopathy Study (ETDRS) chart. Previous treatment for nAMD, long-standing disease, lesion diameter > 6000 µm, thick blood at the fovea and any other confounding ocular disease were exclusion criteria. One eye per participant was studied; the fellow eye was treated according to usual care, if required.Ranibizumab and bevacizumab were procured commercially. Doses were ranibizumab 0.5 mg or bevacizumab 1.25 mg. The repackaged bevacizumab was quality assured. All participants were treated at visits 0, 1 and 2. Participants randomised to the continuous regimen were treated monthly thereafter. Participants randomised to the discontinuous regimen were not retreated after visit 2 unless pre-specified criteria for active disease were met. If retreatment was needed, monthly injections over 3 months were mandated.The primary outcome was BCVA. The non-inferiority margin was 3.5 letters. Secondary outcomes were contrast sensitivity; near visual acuity; reading index; neovascular lesion morphology; generic and disease-specific patient-reported outcomes, including macular disease-specific quality of life; survival free from treatment failure; resource use; quality-adjusted life-years (QALYs); and development of new geographic atrophy (GA) (outcome added during the trial). Results are reported for the study eye, except for patient-reported outcomes.Between 27 March 2008 and 15 October 2010, 610 participants were allocated and treated (314 ranibizumab, 296 bevacizumab; at 3 months, 305 continuous, 300 discontinuous). After 2 years, bevacizumab was neither non-inferior nor inferior to ranibizumab [-1.37 letters, 95% confidence interval (CI) -3.75 to +1.01 letters] and discontinuous treatment was neither non-inferior nor inferior to continuous treatment (-1.63 letters, 95% CI -4.01 to +0.75 letters). Lesion thickness at the fovea was similar by drug [geometric mean ratio (GMR) 0.96, 95% CI 0.90 to 1.03; p = 0.24] but 9% less with continuous treatment (GMR 0.91, 95% CI 0.85 to 0.97; p = 0.004). Odds of developing new GA during the trial were similar by drug [odds ratio (OR) 0.87, 95% CI 0.61 to 1.25; p = 0.46] but significantly higher with continuous treatment (OR 1.47, 95% CI 1.03 to 2.11; p = 0.033). Safety outcomes did not differ by drug but mortality was lower with continuous treatment (OR 0.47, 95% CI 0.22 to 1.03; p = 0.05). Continuous ranibizumab cost £3.5M per QALY compared with continuous bevacizumab; continuous bevacizumab cost £30,220 per QALY compared with discontinuous bevacizumab. These results were robust in sensitivity analyses.Ranibizumab and bevacizumab have similar efficacy. Discontinuing treatment and restarting when required results in slightly worse efficacy. Safety was worse with discontinuous treatment, although new GA developed more often with continuous treatment. Ranibizumab is not cost-effective, although it remains uncertain whether or not continuous bevacizumab is cost-effective compared with discontinuous bevacizumab at £20,000 per QALY threshold. Future studies should focus on the ocular safety of the two drugs, further optimisation of treatment regimens and criteria for stopping treatment.Current Controlled Trials ISRCTN92166560.This project was funded by the NIHR Health Technology Assessment programme and will be published in full in Health Technology Assessment; Vol. 19, No. 78. See the NIHR Journals Library website for further project information.Changes in flare after intravitreal injection of three different anti-vascular endothelial growth factor medications.To compare the change in anterior chamber flare after intravitreal injection of the anti-vascular endothelial growth factor agents bevacizumab, aflibercept, and ranibizumab.Sixty-one eyes of 53 patients underwent intravitreal injection with anti-vascular endothelial growth factor medications for exudative age-related macular degeneration, diabetic macular edema, or retinal vein occlusion. There were a total of 26 eyes injected with bevacizumab, 14 eyes injected with aflibercept, and 21 eyes injected with ranibizumab. Anterior segment flare was measured with a laser flare meter (Kowa) before intravitreal injection and 1 day after injection. The change in flare was analyzed.The mean change in flare after 1 day was +2.5 photons per millisecond in patients who received bevacizumab, 0.0 photons per millisecond for aflibercept, and -0.2 photons per millisecond for ranibizumab. There was a statistically significant difference between the 3 medications (P = 0.006). Pairwise analysis of the change in flare showed a statistically significant difference between bevacizumab and ranibizumab (P = 0.002). The change in flare in patients who received aflibercept was not different from that in those who received bevacizumab (P = 0.08) or ranibizumab (P = 0.99).There was a statistically significant increase in flare after bevacizumab injection compared with ranibizumab. This difference was small and is not believed to be clinically significant. There was no statistical difference in the change in flare between aflibercept and the other medications, although the number of eyes in the aflibercept group was small.Cost-effectiveness model for neovascular age-related macular degeneration: comparing early and late treatment with pegaptanib sodium based on visual acuity.To compare the cost-effectiveness of pegaptanib and usual care within three distinct cohorts of subfoveal neovascular age-related macular degeneration (NV-AMD) patients, that is, those with early, moderate, and late disease, using a comprehensive economic model.A Markov framework was used to model lifetime movement of a subfoveal NV-AMD cohort through health states based on visual acuity. The model takes a US payer perspective of patients over the age of 65 years. Clinical efficacy was based on published results for the 0.3 mg pegaptanib and usual care groups. Expert interviews were conducted to determine adverse event treatment patterns and vision rehabilitation resource use. Incidence and costs of comorbidities such as depression and fractures associated with the effects of declining visual acuity were based on our previously published analysis of Medicare data. Transition probabilities were derived from published clinical trial data for each 3-month cycle. Utilities were derived from published sources. Three runs of the model were conducted with cohorts of newly diagnosed patients. Patients were classified as having early, moderate, or late NV-AMD defined as visual acuity in the better-seeing eye of 20/40 to more than 20/80, 20/80 to more than 20/200, and 20/200 to more than 20/400, respectively. Costs and outcomes were discounted 3.0% per annum.Incremental costs per vision-year gained and per quality-adjusted life-year (QALY) gained for early NV-AMD patients were approximately one-third those of patients with late disease ($15,279 vs. $57,230 and $36,282 vs. $132,381, respectively). On average, patients treated early with either pegaptanib or usual care incurred lower lifetime total direct costs than those treated later. Sensitivity analysis showed that base-case incremental costs per QALY gained for pegaptanib versus usual care were relatively robust.For patients with subfoveal NV-AMD, treatment with pegaptanib should be started as early as possible to maximize the clinical and economic benefits.Quality of life in patients with age-related macular degeneration: results from the VISION study.To assess the impact of treatment with pegaptanib sodium vs usual care on vision-related quality of life (VRQoL) in patients with age-related macular degeneration (AMD).VRQoL was a secondary end point in the trial, a prospective, randomized, double-masked, multicentre, dose-ranging study. Three doses of pegaptanib (0.3, 1, and 3 mg) were compared with usual care with respect to changes in VRQoL as indicated by the 25-item National Eye Institute Visual Function Questionnaire (NEI-VFQ 25), administered at baseline and weeks 30 and 54. Four of the NEI-VFQ 25 domains were prospectively designated as primary: near vision, distance vision, role limitations, and dependency. Between-group differences were assessed using an analysis of covariance model with age, gender, and baseline score as covariates.NEI-VFQ 25 data were available for 569 subjects. At week 54, improvements in the distance vision and role limitations domains were greater in pegaptanib than usual care arms. No substantial increase in ocular pain was noted in pegaptanib-treated patients. No clear superiority of any particular dosage strength of pegaptanib was demonstrated, and no significant differences or trends favoured usual care on any domain score or the NEI-VFQ 25 composite score. The greatest VRQoL benefit was seen in responders (lost<3 lines) to treatment.The VISION trial provided evidence of trends in quality-of-life benefit associated with effective treatment of AMD using pegaptanib. Treatment with pegaptanib is expected to contribute significantly to VRQoL improvement for responder patients.Ranibizumab (Lucentis) versus bevacizumab (Avastin): modelling cost effectiveness.Two new drugs provide startling benefits in the treatment of age-related macular degeneration (AMD). The clinical and cost effectiveness of ranibizumab (Lucentis) was compared to that of bevacizumab (Avastin), which costs up to 100 times less. A cost effectiveness model was developed to assess the cost per quality adjusted life year (QALY) over 10 years. For predominantly classic AMD, the efficacy of bevacizumab relative to ranibizumab would have to be around 40% for the latter to achieve 30 k pounds per QALY, a NICE threshold. Similar but worse results applied to the other main forms of AMD, minimally occult and occult with no classic lesions. The price of ranibizumab would have to be drastically reduced for it to be cost effective. Continued unlicensed use of bevacizumab raises ethical, legal and policy questions. Public pressure may be the most potent weapon in persuading Genentech to license bevacizumab for AMD.Vision-related function after ranibizumab treatment by better- or worse-seeing eye: clinical trial results from MARINA and ANCHOR.To examine the effects of ranibizumab on the National Eye Institute Visual Function Questionnaire-25 (NEI VFQ-25) scores in neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD) according to whether the study eye was the better- or worse-seeing eye at baseline.Within 2 randomized, double-masked clinical trials (MARINA and ANCHOR), the NEI VFQ-25 was administered at 0, 1, 2, 3, 6, 9, 12, 18, and 24 months.We included 646 MARINA and 379 ANCHOR patients.Patients were randomized 1:1:1 to monthly intravitreal ranibizumab (0.3 or 0.5 mg) or control (sham injections for MARINA; photodynamic therapy [PDT] with verteporfin for ANCHOR).Mean change from baseline in NEI VFQ-25 scores at 12 and 24 months.Across all treatment arms, 21% to 38% of enrolled eyes were the better-seeing eye. At the 24-month follow-up visit, mean change in composite scores with ranibizumab seemed to be better than control for both better-seeing eyes (8.4 [95% confidence interval (CI), 5.2-11.6], 7.5 [95% CI, 3.7-11.4], and -9.4 [95% CI, -12.5 to -6.3] for the 0.3-mg, 0.5-mg, and sham groups, respectively) and worse-seeing eyes (1.7 [95% CI, -1.1 to 4.4], 1.7 [95% CI, -0.7 to 4.1], and -5.4 [95% CI, -7.9 to -2.8] for the 0.3-mg, 0.5-mg, and sham groups, respectively) in MARINA, as well as the better-seeing eye in ANCHOR (11.3 [95% CI, 5.3-17.3], 13.3 [95% CI, 7.7-19.0], and -2.7 [95% CI, -9.0 to 3.7] for the 0.3-mg, 0.5-mg, and PDT groups, respectively). When the worse-seeing eye was treated in ANCHOR, such differences could not be detected at 24 months (1.3 [95% CI, -1.7 to 4.2], 2.6 [95% CI, -1.1 to 6.3], and 0.1 [95% CI, -3.5 to 3.7] for the 0.3-mg, 0.5-mg, and PDT groups, respectively).Analysis of patient perception of vision-related function in phase III trials evaluating ranibizumab for neovascular AMD demonstrates improved patient-reported outcomes regardless of whether the treated eye is the better- or worse-seeing eye at onset of treatment, and supports treatment of such lesions with ranibizumab, even those in the worse-seeing eye.Proprietary or commercial disclosure may be found after the references.Pegaptanib 1-year systemic safety results from a safety-pharmacokinetic trial in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration.To characterize the safety, tolerability, and pharmacokinetics of the pegylated anti-vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) aptamer pegaptanib sodium in subfoveal choroidal neovascularization secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Prospective 2-cohort study: (1) open-label cohort and (2) randomized, double-masked, uncontrolled multicenter trial.In the combined cohorts, 147 subjects with any angiographic subtype of subfoveal choroidal neovascularization secondary to AMD and best-corrected visual acuities (VAs) in the study eye of 20/40 to 20/320 and in the fellow eye of 20/800 or better received pegaptanib sodium.Subjects were randomized to receive intravitreous pegaptanib sodium (1 mg or 3 mg [3- and 10-fold higher than the 0.3-mg approved dose]) every 6 weeks for 54 weeks.Safety assessments included blood chemistries, urinalyses, vital signs, electrocardiograms, serum antipegaptanib antibody assays, adverse events, VAs, and intraocular pressures. After the first, fourth, and eighth injections, serial blood samples were obtained for quantification of pegaptanib plasma concentrations.No antipegaptanib immunoglobulin G (IgG) or IgM antibodies were detected. Few systemic adverse events were noted. Mild or moderate ocular adverse events related to the injection procedure were reported in most patients. Pegaptanib did not accumulate in plasma after multiple doses; systemic exposures were similar after the first, fourth, and eighth doses. The mean apparent terminal half-life was 10 days. Evaluation of blood pressure (BP) and urine protein, both of which are known to be affected by systemic VEGF inhibition, indicated no evidence of a pegaptanib treatment effect on these parameters. Mean BP at the end of year 1 remained below 140 mmHg (systolic) and 90 mmHg (diastolic), levels considered hypertension by the American College of Cardiology.At doses up to 10-fold higher than the 0.3-mg dose approved for the treatment of AMD, pegaptanib sodium was well tolerated, with no detectable clinical evidence of systemic VEGF inhibition (i.e., no clinically meaningful changes in proteinuria or mean BP) and no clinically relevant ocular inflammation. Most ocular adverse events were related to the injection procedure itself and were mild or moderate in severity.Systemic bevacizumab (Avastin) therapy for exudative neovascular age-related macular degeneration. The BEAT-AMD-Study.Double-blinded, randomised, prospective, pilot-study to determine the effect of systemic bevacizumab therapy.Subjects with fibrovascular pigment epithelial detachment, subfoveal choroidal neovascularisation extending under the geometric centre of the foveal avascular zone and/or macular thickness of at least 300 microm in both eyes were included. Sixteen eyes were included and randomised equally to receive either three infusions of 5 mg/kg Avastin or 100 ml of 0.9% sodium chloride every 2 weeks. The main outcome measure was the lesion size. The follow-up time was 24 weeks.Throughout the 24-week follow-up, the lesion size and macular thickness decreased in the Avastin group by 0.5 (SD 0.08) mm and 103.6 (14.9) microl respectively. In both groups, visual acuity remained stable in seven eyes and decreased in one eye. At the end of follow-up, 50% of the eyes in the Avastin group became fibrotic, 37.5% remained unchanged, and 12.5% developed a subretinal bleeding. There was a treatable rise in blood pressure after Avastin treatment.Systemic Avastin could be offered to patients with exudative age-related macular degeneration in both eyes and/or patients who refuse intravitreal injections if blood pressure is normal and there is no history of thrombosis.Alternative treatments to inhibit VEGF in age-related choroidal neovascularisation: 2-year findings of the IVAN randomised controlled trial.Bevacizumab has been suggested to have similar effectiveness to ranibizumab for treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration. The Inhibition of VEGF in Age-related choroidal Neovascularisation (IVAN) trial was designed to compare these drugs and different regimens. Here, we report the findings at the prespecified 2-year timepoint.In a multicentre, 2×2 factorial, non-inferiority randomised trial, we enrolled adults aged at least 50 years with active, previously untreated neovascular age-related macular degeneration and a best corrected distance visual acuity (BCVA) of at least 25 letters from 23 hospitals in the UK. Participants were randomly assigned (1:1:1:1) to intravitreal injections of ranibizumab (0·5 mg) or bevacizumab (1·25 mg) in continuous (every month) or discontinuous (as needed) regimens, with monthly review. Study participants and clinical assessors were masked to drug allocation. Allocation to continuous or discontinuous treatment was masked up to 3 months, at which point investigators and participants were unmasked. The primary outcome was BCVA at 2 years, with a prespecified non-inferiority limit of 3·5 letters. The primary safety outcome was arterial thrombotic event or hospital admission for heart failure. Analyses were by modified intention to treat. This trial is registered, number ISRCTN92166560.Between March 27, 2008, and Oct 15, 2010, 628 patients underwent randomisation. 18 were withdrawn; 610 received study drugs (314 ranibizumab; 296 bevacizumab) and were included in analyses. 525 participants reached the visit at 2 years: 134 ranibizumab in continuous regimen, 137 ranibizumab in discontinuous regimen, 127 bevacizumab in continuous regimen, and 127 bevacizumab in discontinuous regimen. For BCVA, bevacizumab was neither non-inferior nor inferior to ranibizumab (mean difference -1·37 letters, 95% CI -3·75 to 1·01; p=0·26). Discontinuous treatment was neither non-inferior nor inferior to continuous treatment (-1·63 letters, -4·01 to 0·75; p=0·18). Frequency of arterial thrombotic events or hospital admission for heart failure did not differ between groups given ranibizumab (20 [6%] of 314 participants) and bevacizumab (12 [4%] of 296; odds ratio [OR] 1·69, 95% CI 0·80-3·57; p=0·16), or those given continuous (12 [4%] of 308) and discontinuous treatment (20 [7%] of 302; 0·56, 0·27-1·19; p=0·13). Mortality was lower with continuous than discontinuous treatment (OR 0·47, 95% CI 0·22-1·03; p=0·05), but did not differ by drug group (0·96, 0·46-2·02; p=0·91).Ranibizumab and bevacizumab have similar efficacy. Reduction in the frequency of retreatment resulted in a small loss of efficacy irrespective of drug. Safety was worse when treatment was administered discontinuously. These findings highlight that the choice of anti-VEGF treatment strategy is less straightforward than previously thought.UK National Institute for Health Research Health Technology Assessment programme.Standardized visual acuity results associated with primary versus secondary bevacizumab (avastin) treatment for choroidal neovascularization in age-related macular degeneration.To compare standardized visual outcomes and macular thickness changes associated with primary and secondary bevacizumab (Avastin; Genentech, Inc., South San Francisco, CA) therapy for choroidal neovascularization (CNV) in age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Eighteen eyes received primary bevacizumab treatment; 20 eyes received pegaptanib (Macugen; Eyetech/OSI Pharmaceuticals, New York, NY) as initial treatment followed by bevacizumab therapy. Both medications were injected at 6-week intervals. Best-corrected visual acuity was measured with the ETDRS chart. Three- and 6-month data were analyzed for all eyes.Mean visual acuity improvement in the primary bevacizumab treatment cohort was 1.5 ETDRS lines at 3 months (P = 0.0009) and 2.2 ETDRS lines at 6 months (P=0.0004) compared with -0.4 ETDRS line at 3 months (P=0.27) and 0.2 ETDRS line at 6 months (P=0.70) in the secondary bevacizumab treatment group. Mean decrease in retinal thickness was also higher in the primary bevacizumab treatment group (90.9 microm [P=0.0037] vs 43.8 microm [P=0.13], respectively) than in the secondary bevacizumab treatment group (73.72 microm [P=0.051] vs 33.0 microm [P=0.21], respectively) at 3 months and 6 months.Primary bevacizumab therapy resulted in significantly greater visual improvement than secondary bevacizumab treatment at 3 months or 6 months. To our knowledge, this is the first report comparing primary bevacizumab treatment of CNV in AMD with secondary bevacizumab treatment after multiple pegaptanib injections.Phase 2a Randomized Clinical Trial: Safety and Post Hoc Analysis of Subretinal rAAV.sFLT-1 for Wet Age-related Macular Degeneration.We present the results of a Phase 2a randomized controlled trial investigating the safety, and secondary endpoints of subretinal rAAV.sFLT-1 gene therapy in patients with active wet age-related macular degeneration (wAMD).All patients (n=32), (ClinicalTrials.gov; NCT01494805), received ranibizumab injections at baseline and week 4, and thereafter according to prespecified criteria. Patients in the gene therapy group (n=21) received rAAV.sFLT-1 (1×10Ocular adverse events (AEs) in the rAAV.sFLT-1 group were mainly procedure related and self-resolved. All 11 phakic patients in the rAAV.sFLT-1 group showed progression of cataract following vitrectomy. No systemic safety signals were observed and none of the serious AEs were associated with rAAV.sFLT-1. AAV2 capsid was not detected and rAAV.sFLT-1 DNA was detected transiently in the tears of 13 patients. ELISPOT analysis did not identify any notable changes in T-cell response. In the rAAV.sFLT-1 group 12 patients had neutralizing antibodies (nAb) to AAV2. There was no change in sFLT-1 levels in bodily fluids. In the rAAV.sFLT-1 group, Best Corrected Visual Acuity (BCVA) improved by a median of 1.0 (IQR: -3.0 to 9.0) Early Treatment Diabetic Retinopathy Study (ETDRS) letters from baseline compared to a median of -5.0 (IQR: -17.5 to 1.0) ETDRS letters change in the control group. Twelve (57%) patients in the rAAV.sFLT-1 group maintained or improved vision compared to 4 (36%) in the control group. The median number of ranibizumab retreatments was 2.0 (IQR: 1.0 to 6.0) for the gene therapy group compared to 4.0 (IQR: 3.5 to 4.0) for the control group. Interpretation rAAV.sFLT-1 combined with the option for co-treatment appears to be a safe and promising approach to the treatment of wAMD.National Health and Medical Research Council of Australia (AP1010405), Lions Eye Institute, Perth Australia, Avalanche Biotechnologies, Menlo Pk, CA, USA.Comparing the Effectiveness of Bevacizumab to Ranibizumab in Patients with Exudative Age-Related Macular Degeneration. The BRAMD Study.To compare the effectiveness of bevacizumab and ranibizumab in the treatment of exudative age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Multicentre, randomized, controlled, double-masked clinical trial in 327 patients. The non-inferiority margin was 4 letters.Patients ≥ 60 years of age with primary or recurrent sub- or juxtafoveal choroidal neovascularization (CNV) secondary to AMD with a total area of CNV < 12 disc areas and a best corrected visual acuity (BCVA) score between 20 and 78 letters on an EDTRS like chart in the study eye.Monthly intravitreal injections with 1.25 mg bevacizumab or 0.5 mg ranibizumab were given during one year. Intention to treat with last observation carried forward analysis was performed.Primary outcome was the change in BCVA in the study eye from baseline to 12 months.The mean gain in BCVA was 5.1 (±14.1) letters in the bevacizumab group (n = 161) and 6.4 (±12.2) letters in the ranibizumab group (n = 166) (p = 0.37). The lower limit of the 95% confidence interval of the difference in BCVA gain was 3.72. The response to bevacizumab was more varied; 24% of patients showed a gain of ≥15 letters, 11% a loss of ≥15 letters and 65% a gain or loss < 15 letters compared to 19%, 5% and 76% respectively for ranibizumab (p = 0.038). No significant differences in absolute CRT and CRT change (p = 0.13) or in the presence of subretinal or intraretinal fluid (p = 0.14 and 0.10, respectively) were observed. However, the presence of any fluid on SD-OCT (subretinal and/or intraretinal) differed significantly (p = 0.020), with definite fluid on SD-OCT in 45% of the patients for bevacizumab versus 31% for ranibizumab. The occurrence of serious adverse events and adverse events was similar, with 34 SAEs and 256 AEs in the bevacizumab group and 37 SAEs and 299 AEs in the ranibizumab group (p = 0.87 and p = 0.48, respectively).Bevacizumab was not inferior to ranibizumab. The response to bevacizumab was more varied with higher percentages of both gainers and losers and more frequently observed retinal fluid on SD-OCT at 12 months when compared to the ranibizumab group.Trialregister.nl NTR1704.Dosing regimen and the frequency of macular hemorrhages in neovascular age-related macular degeneration treated with ranibizumab.The purpose of this study was to investigate if monthly intravitreal ranibizumab decreases risk of macular hemorrhages in patients with choroidal neovascularization secondary to age-related macular degeneration.Incidences of macular hemorrhages in the control and ranibizumab groups from three, multicenter, randomized, clinical trials (MARINA, ANCHOR, and PIER) were compared. Two time intervals (Months 0-3 and 5-17) were evaluated to account for transition from monthly to quarterly injections in PIER. Time interval after Month 17 was excluded because of crossover from control to active treatment in all trials.Months 0-3: All trials showed higher incidence rates of hemorrhages in control compared with ranibizumab groups (ANCHOR: photodynamic therapy [27.3%], 0.3 mg [8.0%], 0.5 mg [8.6%]; MARINA: sham [18.6%], 0.3 mg [8.8%], 0.5 mg [8.8%]; and PIER: sham [16.1%], 0.3 mg [3.4%], 0.5 mg [3.3%]). In ANCHOR and MARINA, data of Months 5-17 showed higher incidence rates in control compared with monthly ranibizumab groups (ANCHOR: photodynamic therapy [47.8%], 0.3 mg [12.5%], 0.5 mg [12.3%]; and MARINA: sham [38.0%], 0.3 mg [13.2%], 0.5 mg [13.0%]), but this was not seen for quarterly ranibizumab groups in PIER (sham [22.4%], 0.3 mg [23.7%], 0.5 mg [28.3%]).Treatment with monthly intravitreal ranibizumab was associated with reduced risk of new macular hemorrhages when compared with photodynamic therapy (ANCHOR) or sham (MARINA and PIER). There was no difference between PIER quarterly ranibizumab-treated and sham patients.Ranibizumab versus verteporfin for neovascular age-related macular degeneration.We compared ranibizumab--a recombinant, humanized, monoclonal antibody Fab that neutralizes all active forms of vascular endothelial growth factor A--with photodynamic therapy with verteporfin in the treatment of predominantly classic neovascular age-related macular degeneration.During the first year of this 2-year, multicenter, double-blind study, we randomly assigned patients in a 1:1:1 ratio to receive monthly intravitreal injections of ranibizumab (0.3 mg or 0.5 mg) plus sham verteporfin therapy or monthly sham injections plus active verteporfin therapy. The primary end point was the proportion of patients losing fewer than 15 letters from baseline visual acuity at 12 months.Of the 423 patients enrolled, 94.3% of those given 0.3 mg of ranibizumab and 96.4% of those given 0.5 mg lost fewer than 15 letters, as compared with 64.3% of those in the verteporfin group (P<0.001 for each comparison). Visual acuity improved by 15 letters or more in 35.7% of the 0.3-mg group and 40.3% of the 0.5-mg group, as compared with 5.6% of the verteporfin group (P<0.001 for each comparison). Mean visual acuity increased by 8.5 letters in the 0.3-mg group and 11.3 letters in the 0.5-mg group, as compared with a decrease of 9.5 letters in the verteporfin group (P<0.001 for each comparison). Among 140 patients treated with 0.5 mg of ranibizumab, presumed endophthalmitis occurred in 2 patients (1.4%) and serious uveitis in 1 (0.7%).Ranibizumab was superior to verteporfin as intravitreal treatment of predominantly classic neovascular age-related macular degeneration, with low rates of serious ocular adverse events. Treatment improved visual acuity on average at 1 year. (ClinicalTrials.gov number, NCT00061594 [ClinicalTrials.gov].).EXTEND-I: safety and efficacy of ranibizumab in Japanese patients with subfoveal choroidal neovascularization secondary to age-related macular degeneration.To evaluate the efficacy and safety of intravitreal ranibizumab for subfoveal choroidal neovascularization (CNV) secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD) in Japanese patients.This open-label, multicentre, Phase I/II study enroled patients into Group A (single injection of ranibizumab nonrandomized doses of 0.3 or 0.5 mg followed by 11 monthly injections of the same dose) and Group B (12 monthly injections of ranibizumab randomized to 0.3 or 0.5 mg). The primary efficacy endpoint was the mean change from baseline in best-corrected visual acuity (BCVA) score at Month 6. Safety was evaluated in all patients who received ranibizumab.Of 88 patients enroled, 12 entered Group A (six per dose) and 76 entered Group B (0.3 mg: n = 35; 0.5 mg: n = 41). Mean change from baseline in BCVA was significantly increased for both doses (Group B) at Month 6 (0.3 mg: +8.1 letters, p = 0.0006; 0.5 mg: +9.0 letters, p < 0.0001) and Month 12 (0.3 mg: +9.5 letters, p = 0.0001; 0.5 mg: +10.5 letters, p < 0.0001). At Month 12, one patient (0.3 mg) and 0 patients (0.5 mg) lost > or =15 letters, while 37.1% (0.3 mg) and 31.7% (0.5 mg) of patients gained > or =15 letters. Ocular serious adverse events (SAEs) of the study eye were reported in 1 and 2 patients in the 0.3- and 0.5-mg groups, respectively. Nonocular SAEs were experienced by 2 and 5 patients in the 0.3- and 0.5-mg groups, respectively. No cases of endophthalmitis were reported.Ranibizumab was effective and well tolerated in Japanese patients with subfoveal CNV secondary to AMD.[Intravitreal bevacizumab versus verteporfin and intravitreal triamcinolone acetonide in patients with neovascular age-related macula degeneration].The aim of this study was to compare intravitreal bevacizumab (IVB) and verteporfin therapy in combination with 4 mg intravitreal triamcinolone (PDT-IVTA) in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).A total of 30 eyes of 30 patients with neovascular AMD were included in a prospective, randomized study. Ten eyes received PDT-IVTA with a standard light fluence of 50 J/cm(2) (SPDT-IVTA), ten were treated with PDT-IVTA with a reduced light fluence of 25 J/cm(2) (RPDT-IVTA) and ten received IVB. The main outcome was evaluated using early treatment diabetic retinopathy study (ETDRS) visual acuity, fluorescein angiography and optical coherence tomography (OCT) at baseline as well as at day 1, week 1, 1 month and 3 months after therapy.At the beginning of therapy, the distribution of the groups was balanced. After 3 months, the SPDT-IVTA group showed a non-significant vision loss of seven letters (p<0.3) while a vision loss of 0.5 letters (p<0.9) was found in the RPDT-IVTA group. At the same time, the IVB group had a vision improvement of 11.8 letters (p<0.001). This vision improvement was statistically significant compared to the results of both PDT-IVTA groups (p<0.005). Central retinal thickness (CRT) decreased up to month 3 in the SPDT-IVTA group by 132 microm, in the RPDT-IVTA group by 78 mum and in the IVB group by 138 microm, (p<0.05 in the three groups). No significant difference in the decrease of CRT was found between the treatment groups after 3 months.IVB shows significantly better results in vision improvement in the short-term compared to the two PDT-IVTA groups. Within 3 months, all groups showed a comparable decrease in CRT. Long-term follow-up is required to evaluate the safety and treatment efficacy of all treatment modalities.A randomised double-masked trial comparing the visual outcome after treatment with ranibizumab or bevacizumab in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration.The current accepted standard treatment for neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD) consists of antivascular endothelial growth factor agents including ranibizumab and bevacizumab. The aim of the study was to examine whether bevacizumab is inferior to ranibizumab with respect to maintaining/improving visual acuity.In this prospective randomised parallel group multicentre trial patients aged more than 50 years with treatment naive nAMD were included at 10 Austrian centres. Patients were randomised to treatment either with 0.5 mg ranibizumab or 1.25 mg bevacizumab. Both groups received three initial monthly injections and thereafter monthly evaluation of visual acuity and the activity of the lesion. Re-treatment was scheduled as needed. Outcome measures were early treatment of diabetic retinopathy visual acuity, retinal thickness, lesion size and safety evaluation.A total of 321 patients were recruited of which four had to be excluded due to different reasons. Of the 317 remaining patients 154 were randomised into the bevacizumab group and 163 into the ranibizumab group. At month 12, there was a mean increase of early treatment of diabetic retinopathy visual acuity of 4.9 letters in the bevacizumab and 4.1 letters in the ranibizumab group (p=0.78). Furthermore, there were no significant differences in the decrease of retinal thickness, change of lesion size and number of adverse events between the groups.Bevacizumab was equivalent to ranibizumab for visual acuity at all time points over 1 year. There was no significant difference of decrease of retinal thickness or number of adverse events.A randomized trial of Pegaptanib sodium for age-related macular degeneration used an innovative design to explore disease-modifying effects.Effectively evaluating disease-modifying effects in clinical trials has posed a problem for clinical trialists and drug development. One method that has been proposed to evaluate disease-modifying effects has been the re-randomization of active group participants to discontinue the intervention after a period sufficient to produce therapeutic effects. We aimed to determine if this design would permit inferences regarding disease modification in a trial evaluating Pegaptanib sodium, an intra-ocular injection, for the treatment of age-related macular degeneration.In two identically designed trials, 1,186 patients were randomized to receive 54 weeks of treatment. After 54 weeks, 1,053 were re-randomized to either stay on treatment or discontinue treatment. Patients were seen at multicenter outpatient clinics.We found that patients randomized to discontinue treatment after 54 weeks of treatment and followed for a further 48 weeks, were significantly different than the control group (sham) in loss of 15 letters of vision (Relative Risk 0.70, 95% Confidence Interval 0.57-0.88, P=0.002), indicating that treatment is disease modifying. This effect was consistent throughout our sensitivity analyses.This trial is the first example of a clinical trial evaluating disease-modifying effects and this design should influence drug discovery to determine further therapeutic potential of pharmacologic interventions.Influence of the Vitreomacular Interface on Treatment Outcomes in the Comparison of Age-Related Macular Degeneration Treatments Trials.To assess the association of the vitreomacular interface with outcomes of eyes treated with anti-vascular endothelial growth factor drugs for neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).Prospective cohort study within a multicenter, randomized clinical trial.Patients enrolled in the Comparison of AMD Treatments Trials (CATT).Treatment was assigned randomly as either ranibizumab or bevacizumab and as 3 different regimens for dosing over a 2-year period. Masked readers at a reading center assessed optical coherence tomography (OCT) scans at baseline and follow-up for vitreomacular traction (VMT) and vitreomacular adhesion (VMA), fluid, and central thickness. Visual acuity (VA) was measured by masked, certified examiners.Anatomic features and VA at baseline and 1 and 2 years and number of treatments.At baseline, 143 patient eyes (12.8%) had VMT or VMA. Compared with those with neither (n = 972), patients with VMT or VMA were younger (mean ± standard error, 75.5 ± 0.6 vs. 79.7 ± 0.24 years; P < 0.0001) and more likely to be male (52.4% vs. 36.2%; P = 0.0003), to be cigarette smokers (68.5% vs. 55.3%; P = 0.003), and to have subretinal fluid on OCT (86.7% vs. 81.0%; P = 0.047). Vitreomacular interface status was not associated with VA at baseline or follow-up. Among eyes treated as needed (n = 598) and followed up for 2 years (n = 516), the mean number of injections was 15.4 ± 0.9 for eyes having VMT at baseline or during follow-up (n = 60), 13.8 ± 0.7 for eyes with VMA at baseline or follow-up (n = 79), and 12.9 ± 0.4 (P = 0.02) for eyes without VMT or VMA (n = 377). In addition, the mean number of injections in eyes treated as needed increased from 13.0 ± 0.3 when VMT was not observed to 13.6 ± 1.3 when observed once and to 17 ± 1.2 when observed more than once during follow-up. At 2 years, geographic atrophy developed in a lower percentage of eyes with VMT or VMA at baseline (11.7%) than with neither condition (22.5%; P = 0.005).In eyes in the CATT, VMT and VMA were infrequent. At baseline and follow-up, VMT or VMA were not associated with VA. Eyes with VMT or VMA treated as needed required on average 2 more injections over 2 years.Effect of photodynamic therapy alone or combined with posterior subtenon triamcinolone acetonide or intravitreal bevacizumab on choroidal hypofluorescence by indocyanine green angiography.Choroidal hypofluorescence has been reported beneath the photodynamic therapy (PDT) site in clinical studies. We evaluated the choroidal hypofluorescence after combined PDT with posterior subtenon injection of triamcinolone acetonide or PDT with an intravitreal injection of bevacizumab for age-related macular degeneration.Two hundred and forty-two eyes with a subfoveal choroidal neovascularization caused by age-related macular degeneration were studied. Ninety-two eyes underwent PDT alone, 90 eyes underwent PDT with sub-Tenon injection of triamcinolone acetonide, and 60 eyes underwent PDT with intravitreal injection of bevacizumab. Verteporfin-induced choroidal hypoperfusion was determined by indocyanine green angiograms. The intensity of the diffuse fluorescence within the PDT site away from the choroidal neovascularization lesion and from the normal retina just peripheral to the optic disk was measured by densitometry (Topcon IMAGEnet computer system, Topcon, Tokyo, Japan) in the indocyanine green angiogram images obtained at 10 minutes 3 months after the PDT. The ratio of the average brightness of the retina within the PDT area to that of the retina peripheral to the optic disk (irradiated/nonirradiated retinal brightness ratio) was calculated for each angiogram.The irradiated/nonirradiated retinal brightness ratio of the angiograms was 0.96 in the PDT-alone group, 0.85 in the sub-Tenon injection of triamcinolone acetonide-PDT group, and 0.89 in the intravitreal injection of bevacizumab-PDT group (Kruskal-Wallis H test, P < 0.05).The degree of choroidal hypofluorescence in the indocyanine green angiogram images 3 months after PDT in the sub-Tenon injection of triamcinolone acetonide and intravitreal injection of bevacizumab group was higher than that of PDT-alone group. Sub-Tenon injection of triamcinolone acetonide and intravitreal injection of bevacizumab can prolong the duration of the choroidal hypofluorescence after PDT.Improved vision-related function after ranibizumab treatment of neovascular age-related macular degeneration: results of a randomized clinical trial.To examine the effects of ranibizumab on patient-reported visual function using the National Eye Institute Visual Function Questionnaire 25 (NEI VFQ-25) in patients with neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD).In MARINA, a randomized, double-masked clinical trial, 716 patients with AMD with recent disease progression and minimally classic or occult with no classic lesion component were randomized 1:1:1 to monthly intravitreal ranibizumab (0.3 or 0.5 mg) or sham injections. The NEI VFQ-25 was administered at 0, 1, 2, 3, 6, 9, 12, 18, and 24 months. Main Outcome Measure Mean change from baseline in NEI VFQ-25 scores at 12 and 24 months.At 12 months, ranibizumab-treated patients (0.3 mg [n = 238] and 0.5 mg [n = 240]) had mean improvements in NEI VFQ-25 composite scores of +5.2 (95% confidence interval [CI], 3.5 to 6.9) and +5.6 (95% CI, 3.9 to 7.4), respectively; sham-injected patients (n = 238) had a mean decline of -2.8 (95% CI, -4.6 to -1.1; P < .001 vs each dose). Ranibizumab-treated patients were more likely to improve in near activities, distance activities, and vision-specific dependency through 24 months.In MARINA, ranibizumab-treated patients were more likely than sham-treated patients to report visual function improvements at 12 and 24 months.Treatment of neovascular AMD with ranibizumab can improve patient-reported visual function in a meaningful way compared with sham treatments.clinicaltrials.gov Identifier: NCT00056836.Responsiveness of NEI VFQ-25 to changes in visual acuity in neovascular AMD: validation studies from two phase 3 clinical trials.To examine the responsiveness of the National Eye Institute Visual Function Questionnaire-25 (NEI VFQ-25) by using data from the MARINA and ANCHOR trials in neovascular age-related macular degeneration (AMD) and to establish the change in the NEI VFQ-25 associated with a 15-letter change in best corrected visual acuity (BCVA).In MARINA, 716 patients were randomized to monthly intravitreal ranibizumab (0.3 or 0.5 mg) or sham injections. In ANCHOR, 423 patients were randomized to monthly ranibizumab (0.3 or 0.5 mg) with sham photodynamic therapy (PDT) or sham ocular injections with verteporfin PDT. Patients had follow-up interviews and BCVA measurements over 24 months. Data were analyzed separately for MARINA and ANCHOR, and treatment groups were pooled within each trial. The clinically relevant difference in NEI VFQ-25 was estimated based on regression models of change from baseline to month 12 in BCVA.Subgroups categorized by BCVA change (>or=15 letters gained, <15 letters lost or gained, or >or=15 letters lost) differed substantially in mean change in NEI VFQ-25 composite scores and three pre-specified subscale scores (near activities, distance activities, and vision-specific dependency) over 12 months. According to the regression models, the difference associated with a 15-letter change was 4 to 6 points for the composite score and the three pre-specified subscales.These data support the use of the NEI VFQ-25 as a responsive and sensitive measure of vision-related function in neovascular AMD populations. Based on MARINA and ANCHOR data, a 4- to 6-point change in NEI VFQ-25 scores represents a clinically meaningful change corresponding to a 15-letter change in BCVA.Incidence of new choroidal neovascularization in fellow eyes of patients treated in the MARINA and ANCHOR trials.To explore whether monthly intravitreal ranibizumab injections are associated with a lower rate of new choroidal neovascularization (CNV) in fellow eyes of patients with unilateral neovascular age-related macular degeneration.Retrospective data analysis of randomized, controlled clinical trials.Incidence of new CNV in fellow eyes was calculated at 12 and 24 months from 2 clinical trials (the Minimally Classic/Occult Trial of the Anti-VEGF Antibody Ranibizumab in the Treatment of Neovascular Age-Related Macular Degeneration [MARINA] study and the Anti-VEGF Antibody for the Treatment of Predominantly Classic Choroidal Neovascularization in Age-Related Macular Degeneration [ANCHOR] study), based on fluorescein angiographic reading center criteria and investigator evaluation. Patients treated with monthly ranibizumab (0.3 and 0.5 mg) were compared with those receiving a sham injection (MARINA) or photodynamic therapy (ANCHOR).In MARINA, new CNV developed in fellow eyes in 20.3% of the 0.3-mg ranibizumab group by 12 months and in 30.4% by 24 months. The conversion rate in the 0.5-mg ranibizumab group was 21.1% and 38.0% by 12 and 24 months, respectively. In the sham group, 26.4% converted by 12 months and 36.3% converted by 24 months. In ANCHOR, fellow eyes in 15.9% of the 0.3-mg ranibizumab group converted by 12 months and fellow eyes in 23.8% converted by 24 months. The conversion rate in the 0.5-mg ranibizumab group was 24.3% and 35.1% by 12 and 24 months, respectively. In the photodynamic therapy group, 25.4% converted by 12 months and 38.8% converted by 24 months. Differences in conversion rates at 12 and 24 months between the 0.3-mg or 0.5-mg ranibizumab groups and respective controls (sham or photodynamic therapy) were not statistically significant.Results of this study do not support the hypothesis that monthly ranibizumab injections reduce the rate of CNV development in untreated fellow eyes.